<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89224-0037 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.2-24-89.f2.A1036</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 36 / Friday, February 24, 1989/ Proposed Rules<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Agricultural Marketing Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">7 CFR Part 955</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. FV-AO-88-3; FV-88-108]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Vidalia Onions Grown in Georgia; Tentative Decision and ReferendumOrder on Proposed Marketing Agreement and Order and Opportunity to FileWritten Exceptions to Tentative Marketing Agreement and Order</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Agricultural Marketing Service (AMS), USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Proposed rule and referendum order.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This tentative decision proposes the issuance, on aninterim basis, of a marketing agreement and order for Vidalia onions. Forthe purposes of this document, the term ``Vidalia onions'' refers to onionsgrown in the proposed production area, which consists of thirteen designatedcounties and portions of six other counties in southeastern Georgia. Theorder would authorize production and marketing research and promotion projectsincluding paid advertising for Vidalia onions. The program would be administeredby a nine member committee consisting of eight growers, of whom at leastfour must also be handlers, and a public member. The program would be financedby assessments levied on Vidalia onion handlers. A primary objective ofthis program would be to improve grower returns by strengthening consumerdemand through various promotion activities and by reducing costs throughproduction and marketing research. Vidalia onion producers will vote ina referendum to determine whether they favor issuance of the proposed interimmarketing order.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>The referendum shall be conducted from March 1-3, 1989.The representative period for the purposes of the referendum herein orderedis September 1, 1987 to August 31, 1988. Written exceptions to this tentativedecision must be received by June 30, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Four copies of written exceptions should be sent tothe Hearing Clerk, United States Department of Agriculture, Room 1079,South Building, Washington, DC 20250-9200. All written exceptions willbe made available for public inspection at the office of the Hearing Clerkduring regular business hours (7 CFR 1.27(b)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>John R. Toth or William G. Pimental,Fruit and Vegetable Division, USDA, AMS, P.O. Box 2276, Winter Haven, Florida33883, telephone 813-299-4770; or Kenneth G. Johnson, Marketing Specialist,Marketing Order Administration Branch, Fruit and Vegetable Division, AMS,USDA, P.O. Box 96456, Room 2525-S, Washington, DC 20090-6456, telephone202-447-2431.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>Prior documents in this proceeding:Notice of Hearing_Issued August 19, 1988, and published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on August 23, 1988 (53 FR 32054).This administrative action is governed by the provisions of sections 556and 557 of Title 5 of the United States Code, and therefore is excludedfrom the requirements of Executive Order 12291.<T3>Preliminary Statement: </T3>Notice is hereby given of the filing withthe Hearing Clerk of this tentative decision with respect to a proposedmarketing agreement and order regulating the handling of Vidalia onionsgrown in Georgia. This notice is issued pursuant to the provisions of theAgricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended (7 U.S.C. 601-674),hereinafter referred to as the Act, and the applicable rules of practiceand procedure governing the formulation of marketing agreements and marketingorders (7 CFR Part 900).The tentative marketing agreement and order were formulated on the recordof a public hearing held at the Toombs County Courthouse in Lyons, Georgiaon September 20-21, 1988. The hearing was held pursuant to the provisionsof the Act. About 20 witnesses, including Vidalia onion producers, handlers,University of Georgia researchers and State Agricultural officials, testifiedin support of the order. Proponents emphasized that Georgia Vidalia onionproducers urgently need a federal marketing order to effectively competewith other onion producing areas. No one at the hearing testified in oppositionto the proposed marketing agreement and order. At the close of the hearing,October 25, 1988, was established as the date post-hearing briefs weredue. One brief was filed by a proponent group.In general, the proponents testified that Georgia Vidalia onion producers,in order to remain competitive with other onion producing areas, must conducta research and development program to reduce costs and increase sales.Testimony indicated that voluntary research and development efforts bythe Vidalia onion industry have not been successful because of the lackof a coherent research and development plan with broad-based industry support.Also, a relatively small percentage of the U.S. onion crop in producedin the specified production area in Georgia, and individual producers andhandlers cannot implement an effective research and development strategy.By contrast, other onion growing areas are sufficiently large to justifyprivate investments (e.g., by seed companies) in research and developmentefforts, with the result being new varieties specifically suited to thoseareas. Proponents believe that an industry wide program is therefore necessaryto enable the pooling of resources to address common problems. A singleproducer or even a small group of producers cannot marshall the resourcesnecessary to conduct effective research and marketing promotion programs.<T3>Small Business Consideration: </T3>In accordance with the provisionsof the Regulatory Flexibility Act (RFA) (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), the Administrator of the Agricultural Marketing Servicehas determined that this action would not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. Small agricultural producershave been defined by the Small Business Administration (SBA) (13 CFR 121.2)as those having average annual gross revenues for the last three yearsof less than $500,000. Small agricultural service firms, which would includehandlers under this order, are defined as those with gross annual revenuesof less than $3.5 million.The purpose of the RFA is to fit regulatory actions to the scale of businesssubject to such actions in order that small businesses will not be undulyor disproportionately burdened. The Act requires the application of uniformrules to regulated handlers. Marketing orders issued pursuant to the Act,and rules issued thereunder, are unique in that they are normally broughtabout through group action of essentially small entities acting on theirown behalf. Thus, both the RFA and the Act are usually compatible withrespect to small business entities. Interested persons were invited topresent evidence at the hearing on the reporting requirements and probableeconomic impact that the proposed order would have on small businesses.The record indicates that there are approximately 160 handlers of Vidaliaonions. During the 1987 season, commerical shipments totalled about 738,40050-pound bags at an average f.o.b. price of $16.75 for a total value ofabout $12.4 million. An undetermined volume was also sold locally at roadsidestands and through mail order operations. While there is a great variancein size of individual handler operations, the record indicates that almostall of the handlers that would be regulated under this order would qualifyas small firms under SBA's definition.The evidence also indicates that there are about 260 Vidalia onion growersin Georgia. The average acreage of onions grown is 27 acres, with the smallestfarm being one-tenth of an acre and the largest farm having 600 acres ofVidalia onions. About 5 percent of the growers farm in excess of 100 acres,and almost 30 percent have less than 5 acres. The record indicates thatthe vast majority of these growers could be classified as small businesses.Witnesses testified that because most of the growers and handlers of Vidaliaonions are small in size, they are unable to individually finance the typesof research and promotion efforts needed by the industry. A marketing orderprogram would provide a means for these small entities to pool their resourcesand work together to solve their common problems. Witnesses testified thatsuch action is necessary for this relatively small industry to remain profitablein the face of intense competition from larger industries.The marketing order would authorize the collection of assessments fromhandlers of Vidalia onions grown in a designated part of Georgia. Assessmentfunds could be used to finance production research projects that couldreduce costs by improving post-harvest handling techniques and reducingthe occurrence of onion diseases. Assessment funds could also be used tostrengthen demand and expand markets for Vidalia onions through marketresearch and product promotion programs, including paid advertising. Theorder would be administered by a committee composed of Vidalia onion producersand a public member nominated by growers and selected by the Secretary.Daily administration of the order would be carried out by a staff hiredby the committee. The order would not regulate the production of Vidaliaonions and would place no restrictions on the quality or quantity of Vidaliaonions that could be handled.The principal requirement of the order which would affect handlers wouldbe the requirement that they pay assessments on fresh market shipmentsof Vidalia onions to fund research and promotion programs. The amount ofthe assessment rate is not specified in the proposed interim order nordid witnesses indicate at the hearing what an appropriate rate might be.Any assessment rate that may be established would be recommended by thecommittee to the Secretary for approval.Acreage and supplies of Vidalia onions have risen dramatically in recentyears, and proponents believe that the marketing order would provide amuch needed means of halting the drop in grower returns experienced inpast seasons. This would be achieved by strengthening demand and developingnew markets for these increasing supplies through promotion of the Vidaliaonion. Also, costs could be reduced through research. Thus, the marketingorder would be expected to have a positive impact on grower returns.The order would also impose some reporting and recordkeeping requirementson handlers. Handler testimony indicated that the expected burden thatwould be imposed with respect to these requirements would be negligible.Most of the information that would be reported to the committee is alreadycompiled by handlers for other uses and is readily available. In compliancewith the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) regulations (5 CFR Part1320) which implement the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. Chapter35) and andSection; 3504(h) of that Act, the information collection and recordkeepingrequirements that may be imposed by this order would be submitted to OMBfor approval. Those requirements would not become effective prior to OMBreview. Any requirements imposed would be evaluated against the potentialbenefits to be derived, and any added burden resulting from increased recordkeepingwould not be significant when compared to those anticipated benefits.Reporting and recordkeeping requirements issued under comparable marketingorder programs impose an average annual burden on each regulated handlerof about one hour. It is reasonable to expect that a comparable burdenmay be imposed under this marketing order on the estimated 160 handlersof Vidalia onions.The Act requires that prior to the issuance of a marketing order, a referendumbe conducted of affected producers to determine whether they favor issuanceof the order. The ballot material that will be used in conducting the referendumhas been submitted to and approved by OMB (OMB No. 0581-0160). It has beenestimated that it will take an average of 10 minutes for each of the approximately260 Vidalia onion growers to participate in the voluntary referendum balloting.Additionally, it has been estimated that it will take approximately fiveminutes for each of the 160 handlers to complete the tentative marketingagreement. In determining that the order would not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities, all of the issues discussedabove were considered. The marketing order provisions have been carefullyreviewed and every effort has been made to eliminate any unnecessary costsor requirements. Although the order may impose some additional costs andrequirements on handlers, it is anticipated that the order would help tostrengthen demand for Vidalia onions grown in Georgia. Therefore, any additionalcosts should be offset by the benefits derived from expanded markets andsales benefiting handlers and producers alike. Accordingly, it is determinedthat the marketing order would not have a significant impact on small handlersor producers.In accordance with Executive Order 12612, consideration has been givenas to whether the proposed interim order would have substantial directeffects on the States, on the relationship between the national governmentand the States, or on the distribution of power and responsibilities amongthe various levels of government. To this end, notice of the hearing conductedto consider the establishment of a Federal marketing order program forVidalia onions grown in Georgia was provided to the Governor of Georgiaas well as to the State's Commissioner of Agriculture. One State officialprovided testimony at the hearing that concluded that the proposed Federalprogram would not conflict with any State statute, would not interferewith any State function, and would impose no burden on the State of Georgia,either financial or otherwise. It is therefore determined that this proposedrule does not have sufficient federalism implications to warrant the preparationof a Federalism Assessment.<T3>Material Issues</T3>The material issues presented on the record of the hearing are as follows:1. Whether the handling of Vidalia onions grown in the proposed productionarea is in the current of interstate or foreign commerce, or directly burdens,obstructs, or affects such commerce;2. Whether the economic and marketing conditions are such that they justifya need for a Federal marketing agreement and order which will tend to effectuatethe declared policy of the Act;3. What the definition of the commodity and the production area to be coveredby the marketing order should be;4. What the identity of the persons and the marketing transactions to beregulated should be; and5. What the specific terms and provisions of the order should be including:(a) The definition of terms used therein which are necessary and incidentalto attain the declared policy and objectives of the order and the Act;(b) The establishment, composition, maintenance, procedures, powers andduties of a committee which shall be the local administrative agency forassisting the Secretary in the administration of the marketing order;(c) The authority to incur expenses and the procedure to levy assessmentson handlers to obtain revenue for paying such expenses;(d) The authority to establish or provide for the establishment of productionand marketing research and market development projects;(e) The establishment of requirements for handler reporting and recordkeeping;(f) The requirement of compliance with all provisions of the order andwith any regulations issued under it; and(g) Additional terms and conditions as set forth in andSection;andSection;955.71 through 955.87 of the Notice of Hearing published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> of August 23, 1988 [53 FR 32054] which are commonto all marketing agreements and orders, and other terms and conditionspublished as andSection;andSection; 955.90 through 955.92 which are commonto marketing agreements only.(6) Determining whether an emergency exists with respect to issue number2.<T3>Findings and Conclusions</T3>The following findings and conclusions on the material issues are basedon the record of the hearing.(1) The record indicates that the handling of Vidalia onions grown in Georgiais in the current of interstate or foreign commerce or directly burdens,obstructs or affects such commerce.The record evidence shows that in 1983, more than half of the commercialshipments of Georgia Vidalia onions were marketed in Atlanta, Georgia.That percentage declined over the following five years, and, in 1987, two-thirdsof the volume moved to markets outside the State. An undetermined but considerablevolume of Vidalia onions is sold within the proposed production area atroadside stands, and some are marketed throughout the United States viamail order operations. Only a small percentage of the crop is processed.The record indicates that no Vidalia onions are currently exported, butthat they likely will be in the future.The shipping season for Georgia Vidalia onions runs from April throughJune each year. About 5 percent of the volume moves in late April, about75 percent in May, and the remaining 20 percent is shipped in June.In addition to Atlanta, the record indicates that other major markets forVidalia onions include Columbia, South Carolina and New York City, NewYork. USDA Market News reports show that these three markets accountedfor about 66 percent of commercial shipments in 1987. Vidalia onions werealso marketed (in descending order of importance) in Cincinnati, Ohio;St. Louis, Missouri; Boston, Massachusetts; Baltimore, Maryland; Chicago,Illinois; Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania; Detroit, Michigan; New Orleans, Louisiana;Buffalo, New York; and Seattle, Washington.The record indicates that during its season, the Georgia Vidalia onionindustry faces strong competition from other domestic onion suppliers aswell as from imported supplies. A major competitor is South Texas, whosetotal shipments of onions during the April through June period averageabout ten times the volume of Georgia Vidalia onions. Even in Atlanta,Texas arrivals exceed those from the Vidalia district of Georgia. DuringApril, May and June of 1987, for example, 10.4 million pounds of Texasonions were marketed in Atlanta, followed by 5.3 million pounds of Vidaliaonions. In addition, 4.0, 2.9, 1.6 and 0.4 million pounds of onions arrivedin Atlanta respectively from Mexico, California, New Mexico and Arizona.Onions from these areas compete with Vidalia onions from Georgia for mostof the same markets.Record evidence shows that any handling of Vidalia onions in fresh marketchannels, including intrastate shipments, exerts an influence on all otherhandling of onions and vice versa. As is true with other commodities, sellersof onions conduct their businesses so as to obtain maximum returns forthe product they have for sale. Handlers and other sellers therefore continuallysurvey all accessible markets so that they may take advantage of the bestpossible prices available. Further, they constantly attempt to developdemand and seek new markets for their product. Likewise, onion buyers considerprices and availability of onions from all sources in making their purchasingdecisions. For this reason, onion supplies and prices in any one locationare promptly known elsewhere and have a direct effect on onion suppliesand prices in all other locations.Therefore, it is hereby found that the handling of Vidalia onions grownin a designated part of Georgia is in the current of interstate commerceor directly burdens, obstructs, or affects such commerce. Hence, all handlingof Vidalia onions grown in Georgia should be covered by the order.(2) The need for the marketing order program for Georgia Vidalia onionsis supported by the evidence in the record of hearing.The record indicates that onions are grown in each of the 50 States, butcommercial production is concentrated in a few. By far the majority ofonions grown in this country (about 85 percent) are produced in the northerntier of States, including Idaho, Oregon, Washington, Michigan and New York.The two principal types of onions grown in these States are globe and Spanish-typeonions. Globe onions are the dominant type grown in the Midwest and Eastand are not generally adaptable to Southern States. They tend to have astrong flavor, are firm to hard to the touch, and keep well under properstorage conditions. Spanish-type onions are particularly well adapted toproduction in the Western States. They are noted for their milder, sweeterflavor, but have a somewhat more limited storage ability than globes. Onionsgrown in the Northern States are harvested primarily in July and August,and the bulk of the crop is placed in storage. Marketing of the late-summeronion crop begins shortly after harvest and continues through the falland winter and into the spring months.As shipments of the late-summer crop are coming to an end, movement ofthe spring crop begins. Spring crop onions are grown primarily in the SouthernStates and are principally of the grano and granex types. These types ofonions are typically sweeter and milder than the globe type, and are moretender and perishable than either the globe or Spanish-type onion. Unlikethe late-summer onion crop, the spring crop is marketed relatively soonafter harvest. Major producers of the spring onion crop are California,Texas, Arizona, and Georgia.Testimony indicated that onions were first planted commercially in ToombsCounty, located in what is now known as the Vidalia district of Georgia,around 1930. According to testimony, it was discovered that the uniquegrowing conditions in this area of southeastern Georgia, particularly thelow sulfur content of the soil, yielded a sweeter, milder onion than thosegrown elsewhere. Prices received for these initial offerings were about$3.50 per fifty-pound bag, which was a very good return 60 years ago. Otherfarmers in the area soon began planting onions, and local demand was strongat the Vidalia State Farmers' Market. The record indicates that virtuallyall current commercial onion production in Georgia is in the Vidalia district.Testimony shows that national distribution of the commodity now known asthe Georgia ``Vidalia onion'' began in the 1970's, the acreage has continuedto increase annually. Expansion has been dramatic over the last twelveyears in particular. Witnesses testified that Vidalia onion acreage totalledless than 500 acres in 1976, and exceeded 7,100 acres in 1988. Given anaverage yield of 300 50-pound bags per acre, production over this sametime period grew from less than 150,000 bags to over 2 million bags.Georgia Vidalia onion acreage currently accounts for about six percentof the U.S. annual total, and an estimated 20 percent of the spring cropacreage. Georgia accounts for less than a fifth of spring onion production,however, because yields are much lower than those in competing growingareas. Witnesses indicated that the average yield for Vidalia onions isabout 150 hundredweight (cwt.) per acre. This compares to 210 cwt. peracre in Texas. Moreover, the average yield for Texas, California, and Arizonacombined is about 270 cwt. per acre.Witnesses attributed the lower yields received by Vidalia onion producersto a number of problems they face in growing their crop. Vidalia onionplantings begin as early as late September and end as late as early March.The majority of growers attempt to have most of the crop planted by lateDecember or early January. Harvest typically begins in late April.Since the growing season spans the winter months, freeze damage is a riskVidalia onion growers face each year. The record indicates that back toback freezes were experienced during the 1983-84 and 1984-85 seasons. Therecord indicates that the high susceptibility of Vidalia onions to winterkill has resulted in a shift from direct seeding to the use of transplantssince 1982. This practice has increased production costs from an averageof $5.22 per bag for direct seeded Vidalia onions to $7.44 per bag fortransplanted Vidalia onions. In addition to increasing costs, overall qualityof the crop has declined since the Vidalia onions that are planted latertend to be less sweet, more pungent and more prone to decay.Freezing temperatures are not the only weather-related problem faced byVidalia onion growers. For example, weather conditions during the winterof 1986-87 were favorable. However, extreme temperature fluctuations duringApril of 1987 resulted in a high percentage of seed stems, and damage wasas high as 40 percent in some fields.The record indicates that in addition to fluctuating temperatures, thehumid climate in the production area provides ideal conditions for thegrowth and spread of bacteria and other organisms which cause disease.Efforts to date have been limited to stopping the spread of disease onceit occurs rather than preventing the initial outbreak. Several researchersfrom the University of Georgia testified that more research is needed inthe areas of disease prevention and control.In addition to the risks faced by Vidalia onion producers during the growingseason, losses are also incurred during post-harvest handling. The recordindicates that poor handling practices remain one of the weakest linksin the marketing of fresh Vidalia onions. The evidence of record is thatin Georgia, at least 15 percent of all Vidalia onions harvested and packedis lost due to damage and subsequent decay before it reaches the wholesaleor retail level, which translates into a $4.5 million loss in potentialannual sales for the growers. In addition to this immediate loss in sales,the merchandising of damaged Vidalia onions results in a tarnished imageand the loss of repeat purchases by consumers.Testimony indicated that onions can be injured at many points as they movefrom the field to retail markets. Damage resulting from bruising, cuttingand scraping decreases the quality and shelf life of the Georgia Vidaliaonion. It is important to recognize the significance of bruising as itrelates to Vidalia onion shelf life. In a survey of over 9,600 USDA inspectioncertificates issued from 1972 to 1984 at the New York Terminal Market,it was found that about two-thirds of the Georgia Vidalia onion arrivalshad either bacterial or mold rot. Over 6,000 of these shipments had atleast two percent decay, which exceeds the tolerance for U.S. No. 1 gradeonions. These Vidalia onions subsequently sold for substantially lowerprices. Decay often does not exist at the time of harvest or packing, butdevelops later because bruising during handling allows decay organismsaccess to the onion flesh.Further testimony stated that bruising could be reduced by installing cushioningdevices at certain points in the packing operation, which may require minimalinvestment by the packer. For example, a study recently conducted by theCooperative Extension Service at the University of Georgia demonstratedthat a 24 percent reduction in Vidalia onion losses could be realized iffoam padding were installed at key damage points in a Vidalia onion packingline.This type of work needs to be done on an industry-wide basis to identifydamage points in the many different packingline designs. Further informationis also needed on the susceptibility of different varieties to bruisingas they move across grading lines.According to testimony, Vidalia onions are susceptible to damage duringhandling because of their soft skins. Vidalia onions have traditionallybeen packed in bags, which offer little physical protection against bruisingand decay. Preliminary work by the Cooperative Extension Service at theUniversity of Georgia has shown that boxes may help reduce damage. Vidaliaonions stacked in bags are easily crushed and bruised. Results show thatbagged Vidalia onions had almost twice the decay loss as those packed inboxes after a forty day period under conditions designed to simulate commercialhandling and storage. While boxes may cost more than bags, the savingsrealized in reduced damage and improved merchandising have the potentialfor outweighing these higher costs in the long run. The record indicatesthat further research is needed to determine the optimal packaging methodfor Vidalia onions.The record indicates that another weakness in current post-harvest handlingpractices is improper storage. Currently produced varieties of Vidaliaonions are highly perishable and cannot be stored for extended periods.Record evidence indicates that preliminary research has shown that thelife of Vidalia onions can be extended by low temperature storage. Evidenceshows that when these onions are stored at 34 anddegrees;F, they become dormantand deterioration proceeds at a significantly reduced rate. In this limitedstudy, Vidalia onions stored at 34 anddegrees;F, had 40 percent less decaythan those stored at 70 anddegrees;F after 2 weeks. After 3 months, the Vidaliaonions stored at 34 anddegrees;F had 60 percent less decay than those storedat the higher temperature. Witnesses testified that additional researchis needed to study the feasibility of implementing these preliminary findingson a commercial basis. Additionally, the identification of varieties withlonger storage capability would benefit the industry.The record indicates that extending the storage life of Vidalia onionshas become a critical need of the industry, particularly in view of itsincreasing supplies and competitive pressures. Witnesses testified thatthe relatively short life of Vidalia onions accentuates the industry'smarketing risks by adding an urgency to move the product quickly into wholesaleand retail channels without regard to existing supplies and prices in thosemarkets.As previously discussed, Vidalia onions are shipped from April throughJune, with peak volume moving in May. Market News data indicate that commercialshipments have risen in recent years, totalling 16.5 million pounds in1985, 28.0 million pounds in 1986, and 36.9 million pounds in 1987.By far the largest domestic suppliers during the April through June periodare Texas and California which shipped 284.0 million pounds and 251.4 millionpounds of onions, respectively, during this period in 1987. The recordindicates that supplies from Texas provide heavier competition in thatthey are shipped to many of the same markets in the East, South and Midwestas are Vidalia onions, while California ships more heavily to Western markets.According to USDA Market News data entered on the record, the average f.o.b.price for ``Jumbo'' size Vidalia onions during the five-year period 1983to 1987 was $19.20 per 50-pound bag. That average is somewhat misleading,however, because it includes the freeze damaged crops of 1984 and 1985,when prices averaged over $24.00. Absent those two years, prices averaged$15.33 per bag. Moreover, these averages are not necessarily indicativeof prices received for all Vidalia onions because a large, but unquantifiedsupply of smaller sizes was shipped and sold for substantially lower prices.Prices for all Texas onions during the same five-year period (1983-1987)averaged $7.81 per 50-pound bag.While per unit prices are higher for Vidalia onions than for onions grownelsewhere, witnesses testified that this does not necessarily translateinto greater net returns for the Georgia industry because the costs associatedwith growing and handling Vidalia onions exceed those in other productionareas. Additionally, as previously indicated, actual prices received formost Vidalia onions were often below reported f.o.b. prices. For example,a USDA Market News summary of the 1987 Vidalia onion season entered inthe record revealed that opening prices for 50-pound bags were $20.00-21.00for large and mostly $15.00 for medium sized Vidalia onions. While pricesremained near their opening levels for about one week, the second weekof the season marked the beginning of a steady decline in price for theremainder of the season. By the third week of the marketing season, manyconsignment shipments were moving throughout the Southeast, Northeast andMidwest. Price returns on many trailer loads were well below prevailingf.o.b. prices. Following the Memorial Day holiday, f.o.b. prices declinedsharply for the remainder of the season, and heavy shipments of consignmentloads continued. Wholesale prices at many terminal markets were at muchlower levels than shipping point f.o.b. prices. Seasonal low f.o.b. pricereturns were recorded at the close of the deal on June 5, when large Vidaliaonions sold for $10.00-$12.00 and medium sizes sold for $7.00-$8.00 per50-pound bag.Finally, while Vidalia onion prices for the largest sizes have historicallybeen higher than those for other onions, witnesses indicated that thismay no longer hold true. In 1988, the season average f.o.b. price for theJumbo size was only $6.65 per bag. The record indicates that this pricewas below production costs, and resulted in losses to growers. Witnessesexpressed the belief that many of the small growers and handlers in theindustry cannot survive another season of heavy losses as occurred in 1988.Witnesses attributed the recent downward trend in Vidalia onion pricesin part to increasing competitive pressures from other larger onion growingareas. Testimony indicated that while the Vidalia onion is considered uniquein its sweetness, other areas are developing sweet varieties of onionsto capitalize on the strong consumer demand for sweet onions. For example,the South Texas onion industry has funded, through a Federal marketingorder, varietal research to develop an onion variety with the desired characteristicsof being mild tasting and sweet. This new variety, called the Texas Grano1015 Y, is now being actively promoted.The record indicates that duringthe 1987-88 fiscal year, the South Texas onion industry budgeted $220,000for research and market development activities. Additionally, handlersin Idaho and Eastern Oregon, also under a Federal marketing order program,budgeted about $760,00 during the same period for promotion and researchof its ``Sweet Spanish Onion''. Witnesses attributed the success theseother growing areas have had to their ability to pool available resourcesunder their respective marketing orders. Other onion growing areas attemptingto expand markets for their sweet onions include Walla Walla County, Washingtonand the Imperial Valley of California.Proponents testified that the research and promotion activities conductedby competitors have assisted those competing industries in developing andpromoting sweeter onion varieties that are challenging the Vidalia onionfor its share of the onion market. It is believed that a similar programis necessary for Vidalia onions to remain in this competitive industry.The record indicates that most Georgia residents are familiar with thetaste and origin of the Vidalia onion. The record also indicates that theyare aware of its unique flavor characteristics and are loyal customers.As the Vidalia industry has grown, the development of new markets has becomenecessary. Testimony also indicates that it is now necessary to differentiatethe Vidalion onion from other onions available in the market-place to garnercustomer loyalty in markets located outside of Georgia.The record indicates that most of the Vidalia onion growers and handlersare not sufficiently large to finance promotion and research programs onan individual basis. In addition, public funds to finance such projectsare scarce. Therefore, the Georgia Vidalia onion industry has attemptedin the past to operate and fund research and development projects undervoluntary programs. Eventually these programs ceased to operate becauseof inadequate support and financing. Witness testimony unanimously supporteda marketing order program to be financed by all handlers for the purposeof strengthening consumer demand through promotion of the commodity andreducing costs through research.Witnesses also testified that market research, in the form of data collectionand analysis, would be an essential part of the overall marketing and promotionstrategy. Currently, limited data is gathered with respect to Vidalia onions.To effectively promote and market Vidalia onions, proponents testifiedthat additional knowledge of market conditions and access to more completedata is necessary to make prudent decisions for focusing promotional effortsand promoting the efficient allocation of resources.In summary, a number of problems were identified in the record which couldbe resolved through a marketing order that would enable the Vidalia industryto work together. Identifying varieties that have good seedling survivalrate, a low susceptibility to cold damage, good eating quality, and increasedstorage capability would add stability to the supply and quality of theVidalia onion crop, and could increase yields and reduce costs. The marketingorder program could assist handlers in solving mutual post-harvest handlingproblems, again in the interest of increasing quality of their offerings,reducing costs and increasing returns. Finally, authorizing the financingof promotion and advertising programs would enable the industry to increaseconsumer awareness of its unique commodity, strengthen demand and increasesales.In view of the foregoing, it is concluded that there is a need for a marketingorder for Vidalia onions grown in a designated part of Georgia. The orderwould meet the needs of the industry and would tend to effectuate the declaredpolicy of the Act.(3) A definition of the term ``production area'' should be included inthe order to delineate the area in which Vidalia onions must be grown beforethe handling thereof is subject to the marketing order. Such term shouldbe defined to include all of the counties of Appling, Bacon, Bulloch, Candler,Emanuel, Evans, Jeff Davis, Montgomery, Tattnall, Telfair, Toombs, Treutlen,Wheeler, and portions of Dodge, Jenkins, Laurens, Long, Screven, and Waynecounties.The area defined in the proposed interim order comprises what is generallyrecognized in the onion trade as the Vidalia district of southeastern Georgia.The counties included are contiguous and share essentially the same growing,harvesting and marketing conditions with respect to Vidalia onions. Whileproduction of Vidalia onions is currently concentrated in the three countiesof Tattnall, Toombs and Montgomery, Vidalia onions are grown throughoutthe proposed production area. Further, the boundaries delineated in theorder are the same as those that appear in Georgia's Vidalia Onion Actof 1986.The Georgia State law restricts the use of the term ``Vidalia onion'' inthe labelling and sale of onions to onions grown in this defined area.Additionally, six growers located outside this geographic area have beengranted variances under the Georgia statute which enable them to sell theironions as Vidalia onions. These variances may not be transferred to othergrowers, and will terminate when these individual growers cease to produceonions.At the hearing, witnesses proposed revising the definition of productionarea appearing in the Notice of Hearing to include these six growers. Testimonyindicated that this addition would make the marketing order productionarea consistent with that defined in the Georgia State law.The record indicates that these six growers farm a total of 57.1 acresof onions, ranging from one-tenth of an acre to 35 acres. One of thesegrowers is located in a county adjacent to the proposed production area,one in a county that is only partially included, and four in three countiesnot contiguous to the proposed area. One grower is about 100 miles outsidethe defined production area.At the hearing and in the brief filed, proponents expressed support forincluding the current acreage of these six growers but opposed any otherenlargement of the proposed production area. The brief further presentedthe argument that there is precedent for the Secretary to define a productionarea for coverage under a marketing order and then modify that area forregulatory purposes. One example cited was a provision in the Californiaraisin marketing order authorizing raisins produced in Southern Californiaused for certain purposes to be exempt from regulation. The examples citedby the proponents were not analogous to this proposal in that they providedexemptions from handling requirements established under marketing ordersfor product grown in the defined production area and used for certain specifiedpurposes.The Act requires that a marketing order be limited in its application tothe smallest geographic area found practicable to accomplish the objectivesof the Act. It would be incongruous with such a finding to conclude, basedupon the record, that the smallest geographic area for this proposed orderencompasses the onion acreage of six individual growers in addition tothe primary production area. This is particularly true since some of theonion-producing acreage in question is located at a considerable distancefrom the primary production area, and the proposed production area wouldnot include onion acreage that would be in proximity or contiguous to thatof those six growers. Any onion acreage adjoining that of those six growerswould possess similar characteristics to that proposed to be included underthe order. Additionally, the Georgia State exemption which permits thosegrowers to market their onions as Vidalia onions expires when the individualproducers cease production of onions, thereby making the production areaas proposed indeterminate. Therefore, the proponents' proposal with respectto these six growers is denied.The geographic area defined in the proposed interim order accounts forover 99 percent of the current onion acreage in Georgia and, accordingto record evidence, is generally recognized by the onion trade and consumersas comprising the Vidalia District of Georgia. It is therefore found thatthe production area as defined in the marketing order is the smallest geographicarea to which the order may be applied, consistent with carrying out thedeclared policy of the Act.The term ``Vidalia onion'' should be defined to specify the commodity coveredby the proposed order and to which the terms and provisions of the marketingorder would be applicable. The record indicates that a ``Vidalia onion''may be one of a number of onion varieties grown in the production area,rather than one specific variety of onion. However, testimony indicatedthat onions acquire special characteristics when grown in the proposedproduction area. This is due in part to the low sulfur content of the soil.Further, according to testimony, the term ``Vidalia onion'' has a specificmeaning in the onion trade, and consumers perceive Vidalia onions as beinga unique commodity distinct from other onions. For these reasons, the term``Vidalia onion'' should be defined to mean all varieties of the yellowGranex type. Further, to provide for the possibility that other types ofonions that have characteristics similar to what is now known as the ``Vidaliaonion'' may be grown in the production area in the future, the committeeshould be authorized, upon approval of the Secretary, to add those typesof onions to the types included under the term ``Vidalia onion''.(4) The term ``handler'' is synonymous with the term ``shipper'' and shouldbe defined to identify the persons who would be subject to regulation underthe order. Such term should apply to any person except a common carriertransporting Vidalia onions owned by another person, who first performsany of the activities within the scope of the term ``handle'' as hereinafterdefined. The definition identifies persons who would be responsible formeeting the requirements of the order, including paying assessments andsubmitting reports.Common or contract carriers transporting Vidalia onions which are ownedby another person should not be considered as handlers, even though theytransport Vidalia onions, because such carriers do not have control overthe Vidalia onions being transported. Nor are they the persons who causethe introduction of such Vidalia onions into the stream of commerce. Theonly interest of common or contract carriers in such Vidalia onions isto transport them for a service charge to destinations determined by others.Growers who handle their own Vidalia onions or Vidalia onions grown byothers would be considered handlers under the order. Any person who purchasesVidalia onions from growers and performs any other handling function suchas grading and packing such Vidalia onions would be a handler.The term ``handle'' should be defined in the order to establish the specificfunctions which would place Vidalia onions in the current of commerce withinthe production area or between the production area and any point outsidethereof, and to provide a basis for determining which functions are subjectto regulation under authority of the marketing order. ``Handle'' and ``ship''are used synonymously and the definition should so indicate.The record indicates that the term ``handle'' should include the acts ofpackaging, loading, transporting or selling Vidalia onions. However, theterm handle shall not include the transportation, sale or delivery of field-runVidalia onions to a handler within the production area for the purposeof having those Vidalia onions prepared for market. In this case, the Vidaliaonions have not yet been prepared for market nor are they in their existingcondition being transported to market. Most sellers and buyers do not considerthem as yet suitable or appropriate for commercial transactions and, assuch, they have not yet entered the stream of commerce.Vidalia onion producers sometimes market their Vidalia onions themselves.In such cases, those growers would be the first handlers of Vidalia onionsand would be responsible for paying assessments and complying with otherorder requirements.(5)(a) Certain terms should be defined for the purpose of designating specificallytheir applicability and limitations whenever they are used in the order.The definition of terms discussed below is necessary and incidental toattain the declared policy and objectives of the order and Act.``Secretary'' should be defined to mean the Secretary of Agriculture ofthe United States, or any officer, or employee of the United States Departmentof Agriculture who has been or who may be delegated the authority to actfor the Secretary.``Act'' should be defined to provide the correct statutory citation forthe Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended. This is thestatute under which the proposed regulatory program would be operative,and this definition avoids the need to refer to the citation throughoutthe order.``Person'' should be defined to mean an individual, partnership, corporation,association, or any other business unit. This definition is the same asthat contained in the Act and insures that it has the same meaning in theorder as it has in the Act.A definition of the term ``registered handler'' was included in the Noticeof Hearing. This provision would have required all Vidalia onion handlersto register with the committee after meeting certain qualifications. However,testimony at the hearing indicated that this requirement would be unnecessaryto administer the order. This definition is therefore being deleted fromthe interim order.The term ``producer'' should be synonymous with ``grower'' and should bedefined to identify those persons who are eligible to vote for, and serveas, producer members and alternates on the committee and those who mayvote in any referendum. The term should mean any person engaged in a proprietarycapacity in the production of Vidalia onions for market within the productionarea. Each business unit (such as a corporation or partnership) shouldbe considered a single producer and should have a single vote in nominationproceedings and referenda. The term ``producer'' should include any personwho owns or shares in the ownership of Vidalia onions such as a landowner,landlord, tenant, or sharecropper. A person who owns and farms land resultingin that person's ownership of the Vidalia onions produced on such landshould be considered a producer. The same is true with respect to a personwho rents and farms land resulting in that person's ownership of all orpart of the Vidalia onions produced on that land.Likewise, a person who owns land which that person does not farm, but asrental for such land obtains the ownership of a portion of the Vidaliaonions produced thereon, should be regarded as a producer for that portionof the Vidalia onions received as rent. The tenant on such land shouldbe regarded as a producer for the remaining portion produced on such land.In each of these situations the person involved in production regardlessof whether an individual, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation,or other business unit, should be considered as one producer entitled toone vote in referenda and committee member nominations.A joint venture is one whereby several persons contribute resources toa single endeavor to produce and market a Vidalia onion crop. In such venture,one party may be the farmer who contributes one or more factors, such aslabor, time, production facilities, or cultural skills, and the other partymay be a handler who contributes money and cultural, harvesting, and marketingsupervision. Normally, a husband and wife operation would be considereda partnership. One test to determine if a person is a producer should bewhether or not the person, that is, the individual or other business unit,has title to the Vidalia onions produced.A number of producers in the production area own or operate packing sheds.A producer who owns or operates a packing shed should not be precludedfrom qualifying as a producer under the order. The term ``producer-handler''should be defined to mean any person who both produces and handles Vidaliaonions. This definition is needed because at least four members of thecommittee are required to be producer-handlers. The Notice of Hearing providedthat to qualify as a producer-handler, a grower would have to handle suchgrower's own production as well as the production of other growers. Therecord indicates, however, that a producer-handler need only handle Vidaliaonions, regardless of who produced them. Therefore, the definition of theterm ``producer-handler'' has been revised to mean a producer who alsohandles Vidalia onions.A definition of the term ``Varieties'' was included in the Notice of Hearing.However, upon the basis of the hearing record, it has been determined thatinclusion of this definition in the proposed order is unnecessary becauseit duplicates the language contained in the definition of the term ``Vidaliaonion.'' It is therefore being deleted from the interim order. The term``Committee'' should be defined to mean the administrative agency knownas the Vidalia Onion Committee established under the provisions of themarketing order. Such a committee is authorized by the Act, and this definitionis merely to avoid the necessity of repeating the full name each time itis used.The term ``fiscal period'' should be defined to mean the annual periodfor which the committee would plan the use of its funds. This period shouldbe established so as to allow sufficient time prior to the time Vidaliaonions are first shipped for the committee to organize and develop itsbudget for the ensuing season. However, it should also be set to minimizeincurring expenses during a fiscal period prior to the time assessmentincome is available to defray such expenses. The Notice of Hearing proposedthat ``fiscal period'' mean the 12-month period beginning January 1 andending the following December 31. However, record evidence indicates thatthe planting, harvesting, and marketing cycle for Vidalia onions grownin the production area begins in September and ends in late May or June.The fiscal period should coincide with the Valdalia onion crop year, becausethe industry typically plans its operation on this basis. A fiscal periodof January 1 through December 31 would be undesirable because this timeperiod would cover portions of two crop years. To eliminate this difficulty,hearing testimony supported the fiscal period being established for a 12-monthperiod beginning September 16 and ending September 15 of the next year.However, if necessary to improve the committee's management or for otherreasons, based on experience once the order is established, it may be desirableto establish a fiscal period other than one ending on September 15. Thus,authority should be included in the order to provide for the establishmentof a different fiscal period if recommended by the committee and approvedby the Secretary. In any event, the beginning date of any new fiscal periodshould be sufficiently in advance of the harvesting season to permit thecommittee to formulate its marketing policy and perform other administrativefunctions. Also, it should be recognized that if at some future date thereis a change in the fiscal period, such change would result in a transitionperiod being more or less than 12 months. Also, if the interim order isissued in time to levy assessments on 1989 shipments, the initial fiscalperiod should end on September 15, 1989, so that the subsequent fiscalperiod would begin September 16, 1989.(b) Pursuant to the Act, it is desirable to establish an agency to administerthe order locally as an aid to the Secretary in carrying out the declaredpolicy of the Act and to provide for effective and efficient operationof the order. The Vidalia Onion Committee should therefore be establishedand consist of nine members, including one public member. The record indicatesthat a committee composed of nine members, with a like number of alternates,would provide adequate representation and would provide for reasonablejudgment and deliberation with respect to recommendations made to the Secretary,and in the discharge of other committee duties.Since the marketing order is intended to primarily benefit Vidalia onionproducers, it is appropriate that the committee be comprised primarilyof growers. Eight of the nine committee members should therefore be Vidaliaonion growers. Since the program would be financed by handlers, and handlerswould be responsible for complying with the terms of the marketing order,however, it would be reasonable to provide for handler representation onthe committee as well. For this reason, proponents proposed that of theeight producer members on the committee, at least four of those membersshould be producer-handlers.The record evidence indicates that the line of differentiation betweengrowers and handlers is somewhat blurred in the Vidalia onion industry,with most growers handling their own production. Of the current 260 growers,over half (about 145 of the total) would qualify to serve as producer-handlers.Less than 20 percent of the current Vidalia onion handlers do not growonions. It is therefore reasonable to expect that handler input would beadequately provided for through the producer-handler membership on thecommittee.The record indicates that, at least initially, producer members and theiralternates should be selected from the production area at large. Sincethe production area is relatively small, this method should be adequateto ensure equitable representation on the committee. However, authorityshould be included in the marketing order to establish districts for thepurpose of committee representation in the future if deemed necessary bythe committee and approved by the Secretary. The record indicates thatVidalia onion production is currently concentrated in the three countiesof Tattnall, Toombs and Montgomery, which together account for about 80percent of production. Should all eight industry members selected to serveon the committee be from these three counties, for example, it may be necessaryto divide the production area into districts to ensure representation ofthe remaining counties. In considering how membership should be apportionedamong these districts consideration should be given to acreage and productionof Vidalia onions in the various districts as well as other relevant factors.This would ensure that adequate input during committee deliberations isobtained from the entire production area. Hearing testimony indicated that the eight persons selected to serve asgrower members or alternates shall be individuals who are producers, orofficers or employees of producers, and who are residents of the productionarea. Such persons could be expected to have strong interests in the effectsof committee decisions of Vidalia onion producers and handlers. Each personselected to serve as a producer-handler should, in addition, be engagedin handling Vidalia onions.At the hearing, witnesses supported adding a public member to the administrativecommittee. While the influence of consumers would be implicitly presentin the deliberations of the producer and producer-handler committee members,and all meetings would be public, the appointment of a public member wouldoffer many advantages. One would be the direct communication between industrymembers and the public member, who would have no connection with the industryand whose opinions would afford the industry an opportunity to discussits problems and concerns with someone who would view these problems andconcerns from outside the Vidalia onion industry. The proposal to add apublic member on the committee is found to have merit and the provisionsof the proposed interim order have been revised accordingly.The public representative and that person's alternate should not be permittedto have a direct financial interest in the production, processing, financing,buying, packing, or marketing of Vidalia onions except as a consumer, norbe a director, officer, or employee of any firm so engaged. Such publicrepresentatives should be able to devote sufficient time and express awillingness to attend committee activities regularly and to familiarizethemselves with the background and economics of the industry. Public membersshould be residents of the production area, since such persons could beexpected to be familiar with and knowledgeable about industry problemsand practices.Each member of the committee, including the public member, should havean alternate. This would ensure that all portions of the production areaare adequately represented in the conduct of the committee's business andthat the continuity of operation is not interrupted. The order should providethat alternate members should meet the same qualifications as their respectivemembers. They would act in the place and stead of their respective membersduring temporary absences. In the case of the death, removal, resignation,or disqualification of a member, the alternate should serve as member untila new member is selected.If both the member and alternate for a particular committee position areabsent from a meeting, the member, the alternate, or the committee, inthat order, should be empowered to designate another alternate from thesame group (i.e., producer or producer-handler) to act in the place ofthe absent member. Only the alternate public member should be able to servein the absence of the public member, however. This procedure would furtherensure the proper and efficient operation of the committee.With the exception of initial members, the term of office of committeemembers and their respective alternates should be for two year and shouldbegin on September 16 and end on September 15, or for such other two yearsperiod as the committee may recommend and the Secretary approve. The recordindicates that the term of office should begin on September 16 becausethat is considered the beginning of the Vidalia onion crop year. The Vidaliaonion season ends sometime during the summer, and begins again in mid-Septemberwhen growers begin seeding for the next year's crop. At that point in time,it can be determined which growers are remaining in business and qualifyto serve on the committee. Beginning the term of office on September 16would also enable new growers to serve on the committee. A two-year term is appropriate because it would give members sufficienttime to become familiar with committee operations and enable them to makemeaningful contributions at committee meetings. Furthermore, a two-yearterm would enable establishment of a rotation so that approximately onehalf of the committee membership would terminate each year. Staggered termswould lend continuity to the committee by insuring that some experiencedmembers would be on the committee at all times. Therefore, the order shouldprovide that the terms shall be determined so that approximately one halfof the total committee membership terminates each year. The effective date of the interim order, if issued, may not coincide withthe specified beginning date of the terms of office of committee membersand alternates. Therefore, a provision is necessary to adjust the initialterms of office. To accomplish this, the order should provide that theterms of office of the initial members and alternates shall begin as soonas possible after the effective date of the order. The Notice of Hearing proposed that the term of office for initial membersand alternates should be established so that one half of the initial membersand alternates would serve for a one-year term and one half would servefor a two-year term. However, record evidence indicates that while it isimportant to provide a constant infusion of new members to the committee,it is equally important to provide continuity and experience. Hearing testimonysupported revising the terms of office for initial producer and producer-handlercommittee members and alternates so that the term of one fourth of theinitial members would be one year; the term of one fourth of the initialmembers would be two years; the term of one fourth of the initial memberswould be three years; and the term of one fourth of the initial memberswould be four years. The record indicates that the appropriate method fordetermining how many years each of the initial members would serve wouldbe for the initial committee member nominees to draw lots at the firstnomination meeting. This would determine which members would serve theinitial one-, two-, three-, and four-year terms and would provide for thedesired rotation of successor members. Since there would be only one publicmember, there is no need to provide for staggering that membership. Theinitial public member should serve a two-year term of office. The provisionsof the proposal have been revised accordingly and are reflected in theproposed interim order. In the event that the initial members are selected prior to September 16,1989, the initial one-year term would not end on September 15, 1989, butwould continue until September 15, 1990. Similarly, the two-, three-, andfour-year terms would end on September 15, 1991, 1992, 1993, respectively.For the purposes of applying the tenure requirements of the proposed order,each of these initial terms would be considered as a one-, two-, three-,or four-year term even though the actual period of the appointment maybe several months longer. In order to prevent unnecessary vacancies from occurring on the committee,the order should provide that members and alternates shall serve in suchcapacity for the portion of the term of office for which they are selected,and until their respective successors are selected. However, so that thereis a continual turnover in membership and infusion of new ideas, the ordershould provide that no member may serve more than three consecutive termson the committee unless specifically exempted by the Secretary. After servingthree consecutive terms, a committee member who has served three termsshould be eligible to serve as an alternate, but should be ineligible toserve as a member for a period of one year. These tenure requirements shouldnot apply to alternate members. In applying the tenure requirements to initial committee members, the principlethat should prevail is limiting total membership to no more than six years.Hence, the initial members serving one and two year terms would be eligibleto serve two additional terms, and the initial members serving three andfour year terms would be eligible to serve only one additional term. The order should provide that the Secretary shall have the authority toselect members and alternates of the committee, but the Vidalia onion growersshould have the responsibility for recommending nominees to the Secretaryfor selection. The nomination procedure outlined in the order would providea means of making available to the Secretary the names of prospective membersand alternates desired by the industry to serve on the committee. The record indicates that the Secretary should conduct a meeting for thepurpose of nominating initial industry committee members. All producersof record in the production area should receive notice of the meeting insufficient time to enable them to attend. Nominations should be receivedand voted upon at these meetings. Those persons receiving the highest numberof votes for each of the positions to be filled should be considered thenominee for that position. The committee should be responsible for conducting subsequent nominationmeetings, and providing notice to Vidalia onion producers of those meetings.While the Notice of Hearing contained a proposal that would allow nominationsto be conducted by mail balloting of growers, no testimony was presentedat the hearing in support of this method of nominations. The proposal inthe Notice also provided that at least one nominee be submitted for eachposition for the Secretary's consideration. Witnesses testified that onlythe nominees receiving the highest number of votes should be submittedto the Secretary for appointment to the committee, since Vidalia oniongrowers should determine who should represent them in administering thismarketing order program. Thus, andSection; 955.22 provides that one nomineebe designated for each member and alternate member position that is vacantor is about to become vacant. Meetings held for nominating members and alternates of subsequent committeesshould be held no later than August 1 of each year or such other date asthe Secretary may specify. Inasmuch as the term of office would begin September16 of each year, nomination meetings should be held in sufficient timeto assure that nominations for members and alternates will be submittedto the Secretary in sufficient time so that appointments may be made priorto the beginning of each new term of office. Nominations should be submitted in such manner and form as the Secretarymay prescribe. One nominee should be designated for each position whichis to be filled the following September 16. Sufficient information abouteach nominee should be provided so the Secretary is able to determine ifsuch person is qualified for the position for which nominated.Only Vidalia onion producers should participate in designating nomineesfor producer and producer-handler members and alternates. All producerswould be entitled to vote for both producer and producer-handler members.That is, the election of producer-handler members should not be limitedto producer-handlers. In the event districts are established in the futurefor nomination purposes, such persons should be growers within the districtin which they so participate. If a person produces Vidalia onions in morethan one district, such person should elect the district within which suchperson wishes to participate in electing nominees for committee membersand alternates.Each grower should be allowed to cast only one vote in the nomination processon behalf of the grower and that grower's agents, subsidiaries, affiliatesand representatives. This limitation, however, is construed to mean thatone vote may be cast for each member and alternate member position whichis to be filled in the district in which that person has chosen to participate.Provisions also should be made for the nomination and selection of a publicmember and alternate. The record indicates that nominees for the publicmember and alternate should be selected by the industry members of thecommittee and should be forwarded to the Secretary no later than November1 or such other date recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary.The nominees would be selected under procedures recommended by the committeeand approved by the Secretary. It is also reasonable to require that thenames of nominees for the initial public member and alternate be submittedto the Secretary as soon as possible after the first regular meeting ofthe initial producer and producer-handler members of the committee. Provisionsof the proposal have been revised to provide for nomination of the publicmember and alternate as supported at the hearing.The order should provide that the members of the committee shall be selectedby the Secretary from persons nominated or from among other qualified persons.In the event nominations are not made within the time and in the mannerspecified in the order, the Secretary may select members and alternateswithout regard to nominations. Such selection should be from qualifiedpersons as provided in the order. Each person to be selected by the Secretaryas a member or as an alternate member of the committee should, prior toselection, qualify by advising the Secretary that such person agrees toserve in the position for which nominated.The order should provide a method for promptly filling any vacancies onthe committee for unexpired terms of office. There may be vacancies causedby the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member oralternate. The order should provide that the Secretary shall be authorizedto name a successor to fill an unexpired term from nominations made inthe same manner as provided for nominating all other members and alternates.Any nomination meetings for the purpose of filling vacancies should beheld within a reasonable amount of time after a vacancy occurs.Committee members and alternates will necessarily incur some expense whileon committee business. Reasonable expenses, which may include travel, mealsand lodging, should be reimbursed to members while attending committeemeetings or performing other duties under the order. Therefore, the ordershould provide that members and alternates, when serving as members ofthe committee, shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursedfor such expenses authorized by the committee and necessarily incurredby them in attending committee meetings and in the performance of theirduties under the order.The order should specify a procedure for the committee to conduct its meetings.It should provide that a majority of all members of the committee is necessaryto constitute a quorum and to pass any motion or approve any committeeaction. Accordingly, five members of the nine member committee must bepresent in order to constitute a quorum and enable the committee to conducta meeting. Five affirmative votes should be required to pass any motionor approve any committee action.There may be times when it will be impossible to assemble the committeepromptly to meet an emergency situation. Therefore, the order also shouldenable committee members, and alternates when acting as members, to voteby mail, telegraph, telephone or other means of communication, providedthat any vote cast orally be confirmed promptly in writing. If an assembledmeeting is held, all votes should be cast in person. The majority quorumand voting requirements should still apply when voting by mail, telegraph,telephone or other means of communication.The committee should be given those specific powers which are set forthin section 608c(7)(C) of the Act. Such powers are granted by the enablingstatutory authority and are necessary for an administrative agency, suchas the Vidalia Onion Committee, to carry out its proper functions.The committee's duties as set forth in the proposed interim order are necessaryfor the discharge of its responsibilities. These duties are similar tothose typically specified for administrative agencies under other programsof this nature. They pertain to specific activities authorized under theorder, such as investigating and compiling information regarding Vidaliaonion marketing conditions, and to the general operation of the order includinghiring employees, appointing officers, and keeping records of all committeetransactions. Among the duties listed in the Notice of Hearing was thatof the committee having its books audited each year by a ``competent accountant.''At the hearing, it was proposed that this term be changed to CertifiedPublic Accountant. This proposal is deemed to have merit, and paragraph(h) of andSection; 955.31 has been revised accordingly.The duties listed in andSection; 955.31 are reasonable and necessary if thecommittee is to function in the manner prescribed under the Act and theorder. It should be recognized that the duties specified are not necessarilyall inclusive, and it may develop that there are other duties which thecommittee may need to perform which are incidental to, and not inconsistentwith, these specified duties.(c) The committee should be authorized under the order to incur such expensesas the Secretary finds are reasonable and likely to be incurred duringeach fiscal year. Such a provision is necessary to assure the maintenanceand functioning of the committee as well as to finance production researchand market promotion programs. Necessary expenses would include, but wouldnot be limited to, such items as employee salaries and benefits; establishmentof an office and equipping such office; telephone and mail services; andbusiness related transportation for the committee staff. Expenses incurredby committee members in attending committee meetings should also be reimbursedas another expense. All such expenses may be incurred on an ongoing basis.The committee should be required to prepare a budget showing estimatesof income and expenditures necessary for the administration of the marketingorder during each fiscal year. The budget, including an analysis of itscomponent parts, should be submitted to the Secretary sufficiently in advanceof each fiscal period to provide for the Secretary's review and approval.While the proponents offered no indication as to what an appropriate timewould be for submission of the committee's annual budget, it typicallyrequires about 60 days for the Secretary's review and approval. Therefore,andSection;955.41 of the proposal has been revised to require the submissionof the committee's recommended budget 60 days prior to the beginning ofthe fiscal period, or such other date as the Secretary may specify. Thesubmitted budget should include a recommendation to the Secretary of arate of assessment designed to secure the income required for such fiscalyear.   The Act authorizes the Secretary to approve the incurring of expenses bythe administrative agency established under an order and states that theorder must contain provisions requiring handlers to pay their pro ratashare of such expenses.  The rate of assessment should be established by the Secretary on the basisof the committee's recommendation and other available information. In theevent that an assessment rate is established which does not generate sufficientincome to pay for the approved expenses, the committee should be authorizedto recommend to the Secretary an increase in the rate of assessment inorder to secure sufficient funds. The Secretary may approve an assessmentrate increase, and such increase should be applicable to all Vidalia onionshandled during the fiscal year to which that assessment rate applies. The record shows that an undetermined amount of production is marketedthrough mail-order sales and roadside stands. Witnesses testified thathandlers who sell their Vidalia onions through such outlets would benefitfrom the research and promotion activities that are contemplated to beconducted under the proposed order. Therefore, such handling of Vidaliaonions should not be exempt from the assessment requirements of the proposedorder.  The order should provide for the payment of assessments by first handlersof Vidalia onions for maintenance and functioning of the committee throughoutthe time the order is in effect, irrespective of whether particular provisionsof the order are suspended or are inoperative. For example, adverse weatherduring a growing season could result in reduced supplies, and thereforeplanned market support activities for the season could be cancelled. Thecommittee should be able to continue levying assessments to pay other approvedexpenses incurred for other purposes.  At the hearing, the proponents recommended adding a provision to andSection;955.42that would allow the establishment of a continuing assessment rate thatwould be carried over from one fiscal period to the next and remain thesame until changed. However, Annual rulemaking, including the opportunityfor public comment, prior to each fiscal period would promote good fiscalpractices and responsibility. In addition, the fiscal year establishedin the order would begin on September 16, about seven months before shipmentsbegin. Since the committee would be required to recommend an assessmentrate prior to September 16, adequate time would be available for the Secretary'sreview and approval. A continuing assessment rate would therefore be unnecessary.Therefore, the provision proposed at the hearing to allow an establishedassessment rate to continue in effect indefinitely has been denied.  If a handler does not pay any assessment by the date it is due, the ordershould provide that the late assessment may be subject to a late paymentcharge or an interest charge at rates set by the committee with the Secretary'sapproval. The record indicates that such charges should not be consideredpenalties, but should be set at rates established to cover additional coststhat may be incurred by the committee in attempting to collect overdueassessments, and should encourage timely payments. The time frame in whichpayments would be considered to be late and late or interest charges incurredshould be recommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary. The committee should be authorized to accept advance payment of assessmentsso that it may pay expenses which become due before assessment income isreceived. This would give the committee more flexibility in paying obligatedexpenses, particularly in the first part of a fiscal year before assessmentfunds are received.  The committee should also be able to borrow money to meet administrativeexpenses that would be incurred before assessment income is sufficientto defray such expenses. However, the committee should not borrow moneyto pay obligations if sufficient funds already exist in the committee'sreserve fund or in other committee accounts.  The committee should also be authorized to receive voluntary contributionsfrom persons other than those assessed under the order for the paymentof production research or promotion activities as authorized by the order.Such contributions should be received by the committee without any obligationsto the donor, and the expenditure of such funds should be under the completecontrol of the committee and subject to the provisions of the order. Thecommittee should not receive a voluntary contribution from any person ifthat contribution could represent a conflict of interest.  With the approval of the Secretary, the committee should be authorizedto carry over any excess assessment income into the following fiscal periodas a reserve. If such excess income is not carried over as a reserve, handlersshould be entitled to a refund proportionate to the assessments each handlerpaid. The reserve should not be allowed to exceed approximately three years'expenses.  One purpose of the reserve fund would be to provide stability in the administrationof the order in the case of a low crop year. Also, establishing a reserveshould minimize the necessity of the committee borrowing money at the beginningof a fiscal year or raising an assessment rate during a season of lessthan anticipated production.  Finally, reserve funds could be used to cover necessary liquidation expensesin the event the order is terminated. Upon such termination, any fundsnot needed to defray liquidation expenses should be disposed of as determinedby the Secretary. To the extent possible, however, these funds should bereturned pro rata to the handlers from whom they were collected.  All funds collected by the committee through assessments or any other provisionof the order should be used only for the purposes set forth in the order.The Secretary should at all times have authority to require the committee,its members and alternates, and its employees and agents to account forall receipts, disbursements, property or records of the committee for whichsuch person has been responsible. Likewise, when any such person ceasesto act in the aforesaid positions, that person should account for all receipts,disbursements, property or records of the committee for which such personhas been responsible. In the event the order is terminated or becomes inoperative,the committee should appoint, with the approval of the Secretary, one ormore trustees for holding records, funds or other property of the committee.(d) The marketing order should authorize the committee to establish andprovide for the establishment of production research, marketing researchand development, and marketing promotion projects, including paid advertising,designed to assist, improve, or promote the marketing, distribution, consumption,or efficient production of Vidalia onions. Funding for these programs shouldcome from any authorized receipts of the committee, including assessmentincome, voluntary contributions and miscellaneous income such as interest.The committee should have the authority to initiate new production andmarketing research projects as well as to contribute to research whichmay currently be taking place.Testimony indicated that public funds for research are becoming scarcerand more difficult to obtain. Proponents of the marketing order proposalbelieve that the Georgia Vidalia onion industry needs to finance researchin the areas of onion storageability and improving cultural practices.The record also supports the need for marketing research and promotionprojects. Research would enable the Georgia Vidalia onion industry to identifyand analyze its current markets and find ways of expanding current marketsand developing new ones.Expanding markets for Vidalia onions could be accomplished by promotionactivities including paid advertising to acquaint wholesalers, retailers,and consumers with the product available from the Vidalia area.Marketing development projects would enable the committee to compile meaningfulmarket data and to explore marketing possibilities, such as how to gainentry to or recapture a specific market. That authority also would enablethe committee to contact buyers, distribute educational material relatingto the handling and marketing of Vidalia onions, and disseminate to theindustry the results of current or past marketing research projects. Itwould also allow the committee to give out promotional literature, recipes,and information relative to consumption or use.The committee should be authorized to conduct these types of activitiesitself, or to contract with other organizations to conduct them on itsbehalf. For example, it was indicated at the hearing that the committeemay choose to contract with the universities or other research groups toconduct such projects or studies for the committee.Record testimony indicated that the committee should be authorized to developa common identifying mark that could be used by all Vidalia onion producersand handlers for the purpose of distinguishing the Vidalia onion in themarketplace. Proponents supported utilizing such a mark in conjunctionwith any paid advertising, to make the consumer aware that they are purchasingGeorgia Vidalia onions. Witnesses supported advertising as a means of increasingdemand for Vidalia onions.Georgia's Vidalia onions have a very limited marketing season (late Aprilto Mid-June) and prices customarily begin to decline rapidly over the season.Proponents believe a limited education and advertising campaign would helpincrease the public's awareness of this specialty onion with the objectiveof expanding the market and increasing consumption of Vidalia onions. Paidadvertising with an identifying mark would assist in clarifying and maintainingthe Georgia Vidalia onion's image in the marketplace in a way not availablethrough other forms of promotion or publicity.Market promotion programs including paid advertising for Vidalia onionscarried out with funds collected under the proposed program would be genericin nature and would not use particular name brands, handler or producernames, or favor any particular portion of the production area. In additionany promotion material or advertising would not be authorized to make falseor unwarranted claims on behalf of Vidalia onions. Nor would such materialbe authorized to include statements which disparage other agriculturalcommodities.The record does not indicate the amount of assessment funds that may beallotted for research and promotion programs. The committee should havethe responsibility to determine the amount of funds spent on each programeach year. Such determination should be based on the needs of each programeach year. The amount of funds to be spent on research and promotion programswould be included in the annual budget required to be submitted to theSecretary for review and approval. All research and promotion projects to be conducted under the order ina given fiscal period should be submitted by the committee to the Secretaryfor approval prior to being undertaken. This will ensure that all projectsare appropriate given the order's authority, and that sufficient fundswill be available for their funding. Further, the committee should be requiredto report at least annually on the progress of each project and at theconclusion of each project. Such reports should be made available to growersand handlers and to the Secretary. (e) The committee should have the authority, with the approval of the Secretary,to require that first handlers submit to the committee such reports andinformation as the committee may need to perform its functions and fulfillits responsibilities under the order. The record indicates that in thenormal course of business, Vidalia onion handlers collect and record informationthat may be needed by the committee. In addition, handlers testified atthe hearing that they currently compile, report and maintain informationsimilar to that which may need to be collected to administer the proposedorder. Witnesses expressed the belief that the reporting requirements thatmay be imposed under the proposed order would not constitute an undue burdenon handler businesses. Reports could be needed by the committee for such purposes as collectingassessments; compiling statistical data for use in evaluating marketingdevelopment projects; making recommendations for production research; anddetermining whether handlers are complying with order requirements. Therecord evidence indicates that to the extent necessary for the committeeto perform its functions, handlers will likely need to provide informationon the quantity of Vidalia onions handled each season. This required informationmay include, but would not necessarily be limited to, the quantities ofVidalia onions received by the handler and the quantities disposed of bysuch handler, the date of each such receipt and disposition, and the identityof the carrier transporting such onions. This should not be construed asa complete list of information the committee might require, nor shouldit be assumed that all of the above would necessarily be required of handlers.There may be other reports or kinds of information which the committeemay find necessary for the proper conduct of its operations under the order.Therefore, the committee should have the authority, with the Secretary'sapproval, to require each handler to furnish such information as it findsnecessary to perform its duties under the order. The record shows that an undetermined amount of production is marketedthrough mail-order sales and roadside stands. However, the record alsosupports the position that all fresh market shipments of Vidalia onionsshould be reported, and that no exemptions under the recordkeeping requirementsshould be provided. Each handler should be required to maintain such records of Vidalia onionsreceived and disposed of as may be necessary to verify the reports thatthe handlers submit to the committee. All such records should be maintainedfor two fiscal periods after the fiscal period in which the transactionsoccurred. The order should provide the authority for the Secretary andauthorized employees of the committee to have access to handlers' premisesto examine those records pertaining to matters within the purview of theorder. This provision would enable verification of compliance with requirementsof the order. All reports and records submitted for committee use by handlers would berequired to remain confidential and be disclosed to none other than personsauthorized by the Secretary, except as required by law. Such reports wouldbecome part of the committee's and Secretary's records. However, the committeeshould be authorized to release composite information compiled from manyor all reports. Such composite information could be helpful to the committeeand to the industry in planning operations under the order and in promotingthe industry. Any release of composite information should not disclosethe identity of the persons furnishing the information or any person'sindividual operation. (f) No handler should be permitted to handle Vidalia onions except in conformitywith the provisions of this part. If the program is to be effective, compliancewith its requirements is essential, and no handler should be permittedto evade any of its provisions. Any such evasion on the part of even onehandler could be demoralizing to those handlers who are in compliance andwould tend to impair the effective operation of the program. At the hearing, the proponents supported adding a sentence to andSection;955.80 to provide that no person located either inside or outside the productionarea could apply the term ``Vidalia onion'' or any other term using theword ``Vidalia'' to any container of onions unless the product in thatcontainer met the definition of Vidalia onions as set forth in andSection;955.5 of the proposed marketing order. This would include the requirementthat the product in the container was grown in the production area delineatedin the order. Witnesses testified that consumers are being deceived when they purchaseonions they believe to be Georgia Vidalia onions, but are actually onionsproduced outside the proposed production area. Proponents testified thatthe application of the Vidalia name to onions not grown in the productionarea is an unfair trade practice which destroys the reputation of the Vidaliaonion and causes harm to the industry. The Act provides that a marketing order can only apply to a defined commoditygrown in a specified production area. No authority exists for regulatingthe handling of that commodity grown outside that production area. Theproponents' proposal with regard to labelling onions grown outside theproduction area is not consistent with the authority in the enabling legislationand is therefore not included in the proposed marketing order. This proposalis denied. (g) The provisions of andSection;andSection; 955.71 through 955.73 and andSection;andSection;955.81 through 955.92 of the order as contained in the Notice of Hearingand hereinafter set forth, are common to marketing agreements and ordersnow operating. All such provisions are incidental to and not inconsistentwith the Act and are necessary to effectuate the other provisions of themarketing order and marketing agreement and to effectuate the declaredpolicy of the Act. The record evidence supports inclusion of each suchprovision as proposed in the Notice of Hearing, with the exception of andSection;955.71 as discussed below. These provisions which are applicable to boththe marketing agreement and the marketing order, identified by sectionnumber and heading are as follows: andSection; 955.71 Termination or suspension;andSection; 955.72 Proceedings after termination; andSection; 955.73 Effectof termination or amendment; andSection; 955.81 Right of the Secretary; andSection;955.82 Duration of immunities; andSection; 955.83 Agents; andSection; 955.84Derogation; andSection; 955.85 Personal liability; andSection; 955.86 Separability;and andSection; 955.87 Amendments. Those provisions applicable to the marketingagreement only are: andSection; 955.90 Counterparts; andSection; 955.91 AdditionalParties; and andSection; 955.92 Order with marketing agreement. The order should provide that the Secretary conduct a periodic referendumevery six years with the initial referendum conducted within six yearsof the effective date of the marketing order. The Secretary of Agriculture has determined that continuance referendaare an effective means for ascertaining whether producers favor continuanceof marketing order programs. The Act provides that the Secretary shallterminate a marketing order whenever, through the conduct of a referendum,it is indicated that a majority of all producers favor termination andsuch majority produced more than 50 percent of the commodity for marketduring a representative period. Since less than 50 percent of all producers usually participate in a referendum,it is difficult to determine overall producer support or opposition totermination of an order. Thus, to provide a basis for determining whetherproducers favor continuance of the order, authority for continuance referendashould be included. Continuance should be based upon the affirmative voteof two-thirds of the producers voting or producers of two-thirds of thevolume of Vidalia onions represented in the referendum. Hearing testimony favored the concept of conducting continuance referenda,but opposed a two-thirds vote requirement to continue the marketing order.It was stated that one-third of the industry should not determine the fateof the program, and that a majority vote would be more equitable. The Act requires that in the promulgation or amendment of a marketing order,at least two-thirds of the producers voting, by number or volume representedin the referendum, must favor the issuance or amendment of a marketingorder. Continuance referenda should be based on the same standard of industrysupport. This requirement is considered adequate to measure the producerssupport to continue the marketing order. Therefore, the proposal that continuancereferenda require a majority vote is denied. The Secretary would considertermination of the order if less than two-thirds of the producers votingin the referendum and producers of less than two-thirds of the volume ofVidalia onions represented in the referendum favor continuance. In evaluatingthe merits of continuance versus termination, the Secretary should notonly consider the results of the referendum but also should consider allother relevant information concerning the operation of the order and therelative benefits and disadvantages to producers, handlers and consumersin order to determine whether continued operation of the order would tendto effectuate the declared policy of the Act. In any event, section 8c(16)(B) of the Act requires the Secretary to terminatethe order whenever the Secretary finds that the majority of all producersfavor termination, and that such majority produced more than 50 percentof the commodity for market. The Secretary's ``Guidelines for Fruit, Vegetable, and Specialty Crop MarketingOrders'' provide for periodic referenda to allow producers the opportunityto indicate their support for or rejection of a marketing order. It isthe position of the Department that periodic referenda ensure that marketingorder programs continue to be accountable to producers, obligate producersto evaluate their programs periodically, and involve them more closelyin their operation. The record evidence supports these goals. The proposed interim order includes miscellaneous changes which have beenmade for clarity and consistency. (6) Section 900.12(d) of the rules of practice and procedure governingproceedings to formulate marketing agreements and marketing orders [7 CFRPart 900] authorizes the Secretary to omit issuing a recommended decisionand providing an opportunity to file exceptions thereto when it has beendetermined on the basis of the hearing record that due and timely executionof the Secretary's functions imperatively and unavoidably requires suchomission. Testimony was presented at the hearing that it was essential for Vidaliaonion producers to have the opportunity to vote on this proposed orderand have it in place prior to the 1989 marketing season which begins inApril. Testimony indicates that the Vidalia onion industry is facing severe problemsdue to dramatic increases in available supplies and growing pressures fromcompeting onion production areas. Last season, prices averaged well belowcosts of production, and many growers fear they will be forced out of businessif this situation recurs during the 1989 season. The proposed marketingorder program has been deemed necessary by the industry to allow it tofind new markets, to reduce its production and handling costs, and to becomeprofitable in the highly competitive onion market. The pressing nature of this issue and the consideration involved in establishinga new market order program require the issuance of a tentative decisionto make it possible to issue an interim rule to implement the marketingorder by April 1989. This procedure will give interested parties the opportunityto comment fully, through exceptions, in the tentative decision and interimmarketing order. Accordingly, for the foregoing reasons, it is found on the basis of thehearing record that the due and timely execution of the Secretary's functionsin this proceeding imperatively and unavoidably requires the omission ofa recommended decision. Rulings on Briefs of Interested PartiesAt the conclusion of the hearing the Administrative Law Judge fixed October25, 1988 as the final date for interested persons to file proposed findingsand conclusions, and written arguments or briefs based upon the evidencereceived at the hearing. One brief was filed by Frank M. Grasberger onbehalf of Farmers Allied for the Vidalia Onion Referendum (FAVOR). In summary,the brief reaffirmed the testimony presented at the hearing in supportof the proposed marketing order. In particular, it reiterated support ofincluding six onion growers located outside the proposed production areaas Vidalia onion growers under the order, but opposed any other enlargementof the proposed production area.Each point included in the brief was carefully considered, along with theevidence in the record, in making the findings and reaching the conclusionsset forth in this tentative decision. To the extent that any suggestedfindings or conclusions contained in the brief are inconsistent with thefindings and conclusions of this tentative decision, the request to makesuch findings or to reach such conclusions are denied for the reasons previouslystated in this decision.Tentative Marketing Agreement and Interim OrderAnnexed hereto and made a part hereof are two documents entitled, respectively,``Tentative Marketing Agreement, Regulating the Handling of Vidalia OnionsGrown in Georgia'', and ``Interim Order Regulating the Handling of VidaliaOnions Grown in Georgia'', which have been decided upon as the detailedand appropriate means of effectuating the foregoing conclusions.If approved by growers in the referendum, the interim order and tentativeagreement would become effective on an interim basis for the 1989 seasonwhich begins in April. Finalizing the proposed marketing order and agreementwould depend upon the nature of the comments received by June 30 and upona favorable vote by growers in a subsequent referendum.<T3>It is hereby ordered, </T3>That this entire decision, except the annexedtentative marketing agreement, be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The regulatory provisions of the tentative marketingagreement are identical to those contained in the interim order as herebyproposed by the annexed interim order which is published with the decision.Referendum OrderIt is hereby directed that a referendum be conducted in accordance withthe procedure for the conduct of referenda (7 CFR 900.400 <T3>et seq.</T3>), to determine whether the issuance of the annexed interimorder as hereby proposed regulating the handling of Vidalia onions grownin Georgia, is approved or favored by producers, as defined under the termsof the order, who during the representative period were engaged in theproduction of Vidalia onions in the production area.The representative period for the conduct of such referendum is herebydetermined to be September 1, 1987 through August 31, 1988.The agents of the Secretary to conduct such referendum are hereby designatedto be John R. Toth and William G. Pimental, Fruit and Vegetable Division,Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA, P.O. Box 2276, Winter Haven, Florida33883, telephone 813-299-4770; and Anne M. Dec, Marketing Order AdministrationBranch, Fruit and Vegetable Division, Agricultural Marketing Service, USDA,Room 2525-S, P.O. Box 96456, Washington, DC 20090-6456, telephone 202-447-2020.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 7 CFR Part 955</ITAG>Marketing agreements and orders, Vidalia onions, Georgia.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: February 21, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Robert Melland,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Deputy Assistant Secretary, Marketing and Inspection Services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Interim Order Regulating the Handling of Vidalia Onions Produced inGeorgia \1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ This order shall not become effective unless and untilthe requirements of andSection; 900.14 of the rules of practice and proceduregoverning proceedings to formulate marketing agreements and marketing ordershave been met.<T3>Findings upon the basis of the hearing record.</T3> Pursuant to theprovisions of the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended[7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>], and the applicable rules of practice and procedure effectivethereunder [7 CFR Part 900], a public hearing was held upon a proposedmarketing agreement and order regulating the handling of Vidalia onionsgrown in Georgia.Upon the basis of the record it is found that:(1) The tentative marketing agreement and interim order, and all of theterms and conditions thereof, will tend to effectuate the declared policyof the Act;(2) The tentative marketing agreement and interim order regulate the handlingof Vidalia onions grown in the production area in the same manner as, andare applicable only to persons in the respective classes of commercialand industrial activity specified in, the proposed marketing agreementand order upon which a hearing has been held;(3) The tentative marketing agreement and interim order are limited intheir application to the smallest regional production area which is practicable,consistent with carrying out the declared policy of the Act, and the issuanceof several orders applicable to subdivisions of the production area wouldnot effectively carry out the declared policy of the Act;(4) There are no differences in the production and marketing of Vidaliaonions produced in the production area which make necessary different termsand provisions applicable to different parts of such area; and(5) All handling of Vidalia onions grown in the production area is in thecurrent of interstate or foreign commerce or directly burdens, obstructs,or affects such commerce.<T3>It is therefore ordered,</T3> that on and after the effective datethereof, all handling of Vidalia onions grown in the production area shallbe in conformity to, and in compliance with, the terms and conditions ofthe said interim order, as follows:The provisions of the tentative marketing agreement and interim order areset forth in full herein. Those sections identified with an asterisk (*)apply to only proposed tentative marketing agreement and not to the proposedinterim order.It is proposed that Title 7, Chapter IX be amended by adding Part 955 toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 955_VIDALIA ONIONS GROWN IN GEORGIA</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.1 Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.2 Act.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.3 Person.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.4 Production area.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.5 Vidalia onion.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.6 Handler.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.7 Handle.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.9 Producer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.10 Producer-handler.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.12 Committee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.13 Fiscal period.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Committee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.20 Establishment and membership.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.21 Term of office.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.22 Nominations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.23 Selection.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.24 Acceptance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.25 Alternates.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.26 Vacancies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.27 Failure to nominate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.28 Procedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.29 Expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.30 Powers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.31 Duties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Expenses and Assessments</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.40 Expenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.41 Budget.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.42 Assessments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.43 Accounting.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.44 Excess funds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.45 Contributions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Research and Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.50 Research and development.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Reports and Recordkeeping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.60 Reports and recordkeeping.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Miscellaneous Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.71 Termination or suspension.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.72 Proceedings after termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.73 Effect of termination or amendment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.80 Compliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.81 Right of the Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.82 Duration of immunities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.83 Agents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.84 Derogation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.85 Personal liability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.86 Separability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">955.87 Amendments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Marketing Agreement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">*955.90 Counterparts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">*955.91 Additional parties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">*955.92 Order with marketing agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Authority: Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601-674.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Secretary.</ITAG>``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States,or any officer or employee of the Department of Agriculture who has beendelegated, or who may hereafter be delegated, the authority to act forthe Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Act.</ITAG>``Act'' means Public Act No. 10, 73d Congress (May 12, 1933), as amendedand as reenacted and amended by the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Actof 1937, as amended [Sec. 1-19, 48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>].<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Person.</ITAG>``Person'' means an individual, partnership, corporation, association,or any other business unit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Production area.</ITAG>``Production area'' means that part of the State of Georgia enclosed bythe following boundaries: Beginning at a point in Laurens County whereU.S. Highway 441 intersects Highway 16; thence continue southerly alongU.S. Highway 441 to a point where it intersects the southern boundary ofLaurens County; thence southwesterly along the border of Laurens Countyto a point where it intersects the county road known as Jay Bird SpringsRoad; thence southeasterly along Jay Bird Springs Road to a point whereit intersects U.S. Highway 23; thence easterly to a point where U.S. Highway23 intersects the western border of Telfair County; thence southwesterlyfollowing the western and southern border of Telfair County to a pointwhere it intersects with Jeff Davis County; thence following the southernborder of Jeff Davis County to a point where it intersects with the westernborder of Bacon County; thence southerly and easterly along the borderof Bacon County to a point where it intersects Georgia State Road 32; thenceeasterly along Georgia State Road 32 to Seaboard Coastline Railroad; thencenortheasterly along the tracks of Seaboard Coastline Railroad to a pointwhere they intersect Long County and Liberty County; thence northwesterlyand northerly along the southwestern border of Liberty County to a pointwhere the border of Liberty County intersects the southern border of EvansCounty; thence northeasterly along the eastern border of Evans County tothe intersection of the Bulloch County border; thence northeasterly alongthe Bulloch County border to a point where it intersects with the OgeecheeRiver; thence northerly along the main channel of the Ogeechee River toa point where it intersects with the southeastern border of Screven County;thence northeasterly along the southeasterly border of Screven County tothe main channel of the Savannah River; thence northerly along the mainchannel of the Savannah River to a point where the northwestern boundaryof Hampton County, South Carolina intersects the Savannah River; thencedue west to a point where State Road 24 intersects Brannen Bridge Road;thence westerly along Brannen Bridge Road to a point where it intersectswith State Road 21; thence westerly along State Road 21 to the intersectionof State Road 17; thence westerly along State Road 17 to the intersectionof State Road 56 and southerly to the northern border of Emanuel County;thence westerly and southerly along the border of Emanuel County to a pointwhere it intersects the Treutlen County border; thence southerly to a pointwhere the Truetlen County border intersects Interstate Highway 16; thencewesterly to the point of beginning in Laurens County.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vidalia onion.</ITAG>``Vidalia onion'' means all varieties of <T3>Allium cepa </T3>of the hybrid yellow granex, granex parentage or anyother similar variety recommended by the committee and approved by theSecretary, that are grown in the production area.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.6 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handler.</ITAG>``Handler'' is synonymous with ``shipper'' and means any person (excepta common or contract carrier of Vidalia onions owned by another person)who handles Vidalia onions, or causes Vidalia onions to be handled.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Handle.</ITAG>``Handle'' or ``ship'' means to package, load, sell, transport, or in anyother way to place Vidalia onions, or cause Vidalia onions to be placed,in the current of commerce within the production area or between the productionarea and any point outside thereof. Such term shall not include the transportation,sale, or delivery of field-run Vidalia onions to a person within the productionarea for the purpose of having such Vidalia onions prepared for market.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.9 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer.</ITAG>``Producer'' is synonymous with ``grower'' and means any person engagedin a proprietary capacity in the production of Vidalia onions for market.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.10 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Producer-Handler.</ITAG>``Producer-Handler'' means a producer who handles Vidalia onions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Committee.</ITAG>``Committee'' means the Vidalia Onion Committee, established pursuant toandSection;955.20.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fiscal period.</ITAG>``Fiscal period'' means the 12-month period beginning on September 16 andending on September 15 of the next year or such other period that may berecommended by the committee and approved by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="84">Committee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.20 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Establishment and membership.</ITAG>(a) There is hereby established a Vidalia Onion Committee, consisting ofnine members, to administer the terms and provisions of this part. Eightmembers shall be producers, and one shall be a public member. At leastfour of the producer members shall be producer-handlers. Each member shallhave an alternate who shall have the same qualifications as the member.(b) Each member, other than the public member, shall be an individual whois, prior to selection and during such member's term of office, a residentof the production area and a grower or an officer or employee of a grower.(c) The public member shall be a resident of the production area and shallhave no direct financial interest in the commercial production, financing,buying, packing or marketing of Vidalia onions, except as a consumer, norshall such person be a director, officer or employee of any firm so engaged.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.21 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Term of office.</ITAG>(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this section, theterm of office of committee members and their respective alternates shallbe for two years and shall begin as of September 16 or for such other periodas the committee may recommend and the Secretary approve. The terms shallbe determined so that approximately one-half of the total committee membershipshall terminate each year. Members and alternates shall serve in such capacityduring the term of office or portion thereof for which they are selectedand until their respective successors are selected.(b) The term of office of the initial members and alternates shall beginas soon as possible after the effective date of this part. As determinedby lot drawn at the initial nomination meeting, one-fourth of the initialgrower members and alternates shall serve for a one-year term, one-fourthshall serve for a two-year term, one-fourth shall serve for a three-yearterm, and one-fourth shall serve for a four-year term. The term of officefor the initial public member and alternate shall be for two years.(c) The consecutive terms of office of members shall be limited to three2-year terms.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.22 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nominations.</ITAG>(a) Initial members. For nominations to the initial committee, a meetingof producers shall be held by the Secretary.(b) Successor members. (1) The committee shall hold or cause to be heldnot later than August 1 of each year, or such other date as may be specifiedby the Secretary, a meeting or meetings of growers for the purpose of designatingone nominee for each position as member and for each position as alternatemember of the committee which is vacant, or which is about to become vacant.(2) Nominations for members and alternates shall be supplied to the Secretaryin such manner and form as the Secretary may prescribe, not later thanAugust 15 of each year, or by such other date as may be specified by theSecretary.(3) The Secretary may, upon recommendation of the committee, divide theproduction area into districts for the purpose of nominating committeemembers and their alternates.(c) Only producers may participate in designating nominees to serve ascommittee members. Each producer is entitled to cast only one vote on behalfof such producer and such producer's agents, subsidiaries, affiliates,and representatives in designating nominees for committee members and alternates.An eligible voter's privilege of casting only one vote shall be construedto permit a voter to cast one vote for each position to be filled.(d) The producer members shall nominate the public member and alternatemember at the first meeting following the selection of members for a newterm of office. Nominations for the public member and alternate membershall be supplied to the Secretary in such manner and form as the Secretarymay prescribe, not later than November 1, or such other date as may bespecified by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection.</ITAG>From the nominations made pursuant to andSection;955.22 or from other qualifiedpersons, the Secretary shall select members and alternate members of thecommittee. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acceptance. </ITAG>Any person nominated to serve as a member or alternate member of the committeeshall, prior to selection by the Secretary, qualify by filing a writtenacceptance indicating such person's willingness to serve in the positionfor which nominated. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;955.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Alternates. </ITAG>An alternate member of the committee shall act in the place and stead ofthe member for whom such person is an alternate during such member's absenceor when designated to so by such member. In the event both a member ofthe committee and that member's alternate are unable to attend a committeemeeting, the member, the alternate, or the committee, in that order, maydesignate another alternate from the same district (if applicable) andthe same group (producer or producer-handler) to serve in such member'sstead. Only the public member's alternate is authorized to serve in theplace and stead of the public member. In the event of the death, removal,resignation or disqualification of a member, that member's alternate shallserve until a successor to such member is selected. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vacancies. </ITAG>To fill any vacancy occasioned by the failure of any person nominated asa member or as an alternate to qualify, or in the event of the death, removal,resignation, or disqualification of a member or alternate, a successorfor the unexpired term may be selected by the Secretary from nominationsmade pursuant to andSection; 955.22, or from other eligible persons. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to nominate. </ITAG>If nominations are not made within the time and manner prescribed in andSection;955.22, the Secretary may, without regard to nominations, select membersand alternates on the basis of the representation provided for andSection;955.20. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.28</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedure. </ITAG>(a) Five members of the committee shall constitute a quorum, and five concurringvotes shall be required to pass any motion or approve any committee action.(b) The committee may provide for meetings by telephone, telegraph, orother means of communication, and any vote cast orally at such meetingsshall be confirmed promptly in writing: <T3>Provided, </T3>that if an assembled meeting is held, all votes shallbe cast in person. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses. </ITAG>Members and alternates shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursedfor such expenses authorized by the committee and necessarily incurredby them in attending committee meetings and in the performance of theirduties under this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Powers. </ITAG>The committee shall have the following powers: (a) To administer the provisions of this part in accordance with its terms;(b) To make rules and regulations to effectuate the terms and provisionsof this part; (c) To receive, investigate, and report to the Secretary complaints ofviolation of the provisions of this part; and (d) To recommend to the Secretary amendments to this part. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duties. </ITAG>The committee shall have, among others, the following duties: (a) As soon as practicable after the beginning of each term of office,to meet and organize, to select a chairman and such other officers as maybe necessary, to select subcommittees of committee members of alternates,and to adopt such rules and regulations for the conduct of its businessas it deems necessary; (b) To act as intermediary between the Secretary and any producer or handler;(c) To furnish to the Secretary such available information as may be requested;(d) To appoint such employees, agents, and representatives as it may deemnecessary, to determine the compensation and define the duties of eachsuch person, and to protect the handling of committee funds; (e) To investigate from time to time and to assemble data on the growing,harvesting, shipping, and marketing conditions with respect to Vidaliaonions; (f) To keep minutes, books, and records which clearly reflect all of theact and transactions of the committee. Such minutes, books, and recordsshall be subject to examination at any time by the Secretary or the Secretary'sauthorized agent or representative. Minutes of each committee meeting shallbe furnished promptly to the Secretary; (g) Prior to the beginning of each fiscal period, to prepare and submitto the Secretary a budget of its projected income and expenses for suchfiscal period, together with a report thereon and a recommendation as tothe rate of assessment for such period; (h) To cause its books to be audited by a Certified Public Accountant atleast once each fiscal period, and at such other time as the committeemay deem necessary or as the Secretary may request. The report of suchaudit shall show the receipt and expenditure of funds collected pursuantto this part. A copy of each report shall be furnished to the Secretary.A copy shall also be made available at the principal office of the committeefor inspection by producers and handlers provided that confidential informationshall be removed; (i) To give the Secretary the same notice of meetings of the committeeand its subcommittees as is given to its members. <ITAG tagnum="84">Expenses and Assessments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Expenses. </ITAG>The committee is authorized to incur such expenses as the Secretary mayfind are reasonable and likely to be incurred by the committee for itsmaintenance and functioning, and to enable it to exercise its powers andperform its duties in accordance with the provisions of this part. Thefunds to cover such expenses shall be acquired in the manner prescribedin andSection; 955.42 and andSection; 955.45. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Budget.</ITAG>At least 60 days prior to each fiscal period, or such other date as maybe specified by the Secretary, and as may be necessary thereafter, thecommittee shall prepare an estimated budget of income and expendituresnecessary for the administration of this part. The committee may recommenda rate of assessment calculated to provide adequate funds to defray itsproposed expenditures. The committee shall present such budget to the Secretarywith an accompanying report showing the basis for its calculations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessments.</ITAG>(a) The funds to cover the committee's expenses shall be acquired by thelevying of assessments upon handlers as provided in this subpart. Eachperson who first handles Vidalia onions shall pay assessments to the committeeupon demand, which assessments shall be in payment of such handler's prorata share of the committee's expenses.(b) Assessments shall be levied upon handlers at rates established by theSecretary. Such rates may be established upon the basis of the committee'srecommendations or other available information.(c) At any time during, or subsequent to, a given fiscal period the committeemay recommend the approval of an amended budget and an increase in therate of assessment. Upon the basis of such recommendations, or other availableinformation, the Secretary may approve an amended budget and increase theassessment rate. Such increase shall be applicable to all Vidalia onionswhich were handled during such fiscal period.(d) The payment of assessments for the maintenance and functioning of thecommittee may be required under this part throughout the period it is ineffect irrespective of whether particular provisions of this part are suspendedor become inoperative.(e) To provide funds for the administration of the provisions of this partduring the initial fiscal period or the first part of a fiscal period whenneither sufficient operating reserve funds nor sufficient revenue fromassessments on the current season's shipments are available, the committeemay accept payment of assessments in advance or may borrow money for suchpurposes.(f) The committee may impose a late payment charge or an interest chargeor both, on any handler who fails to pay any assessment in a timely manner.Such time and the rates shall be recommended by the committee and approvedby the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Accounting.</ITAG>(a) All funds received by the committee pursuant to the provisions of thispart shall be used solely for the purposes specified in this part.(b) The Secretary may at any time require the committee, its members andalternates, employees, agents and all other persons to account for allreceipts and disbursements, funds, property, or records for which theyare responsible. Whenever any person ceases to be a member or alternateof the committee, such person shall account for all receipts and disbursementsand deliver all property and funds in such member's possession to the committee,pertaining to the committee's activities for which such person was responsible,and shall execute such assignments and other instruments as may be necessaryor appropriate to vest in the committee full title to all of the property,funds, and claims vested in such person.(c) The committee may make recommendations to the Secretary for one ormore of the members thereof, or any other person, to act as a trustee forholding records, funds, or any other committee property during periodsof suspension of this part, or during any period or periods when regulationsare not in effect and, upon determining such action is appropriate, theSecretary may direct that such person or persons shall act as trustee ortrustees for the committee.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.44</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Excess funds.</ITAG>If, at the end of a fiscal period, the assessments collected are in excessof expenses incurred, such excess shall be accounted for as follows:(a) The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may establish anoperating reserve and may carry over to subsequent fiscal periods excessfunds in a reserve so established, except funds in the reserve shall notexceed the equivalent of approximately three fiscal periods' budgeted expenses.Such reserve funds may be used to defray any expenses authorized underthis part, to defray expenses during any fiscal period prior to the timeassessment income is sufficient to cover such expenses, to cover deficitsincurred during any fiscal period when assessment income is less than expenses,to defray expenses incurred during any period when any or all provisionsof this part are suspended or are inoperative, and to cover necessary expensesof liquidation in the event of termination of this part. Upon terminationof this part, any funds not required to defray the necessary expenses ofliquidation shall be disposed of in such manner as the Secretary may determineto be appropriate except that to the extent practicable, such funds shallbe returned pro rata to the persons from whom such funds are collected.(b) If such excess is not retained in a reserve as provided in paragraph(a) of this section, each handler entitled to a proportionate refund ofthe excess assessments collected shall be credited at the end of a fiscalperiod with such refund against the operations of the following fiscalperiod unless such handler demands payment thereof, in which event suchproportionate refund shall be paid.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.45.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contributions.</ITAG>The committee may accept voluntary contributions but these shall only beused to pay expenses incurred pursuant to andSection; 955.50. Such contributionsshall be free from any encumbrances by the donor, and the committee shallretain complete control of their use.<ITAG tagnum="84">Research and Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Research and development.</ITAG>(a) The committee, with the approval of the Secretary, may establish orprovide for the establishment of production research, marketing researchand development and marketing promotion projects, including paid advertising,designed to assist, improve, or promote the marketing, distribution, consumption,or efficient production of Vidalia onions. Any such project for the promotionand advertising of Vidalia onions may utilize an identifying mark whichshall be made available for use by all handlers in accordance with suchterms and conditions as the committee, with the approval of the Secretary,may prescribe. The expense of such projects shall be paid from funds collectedpursuant to andSection; 955.42 or andSection; 955.45.(b) In recommending projects pursuant to this section, the committee shallgive consideration to the following:(1) The expected supply of Vidalia onions in relation to market requirements;(2) The supply situation among competing areas and commodities;(3) The anticipated benefits from such projects in relation to their costs;(4) The need for marketing research with respect to any market developmentactivity; and(5) Other relevant factors.(c) If the committee should conclude that a program of research and developmentshould be undertaken, or continued, in any fiscal period, it shall submitthe following for the approval of the Secretary:(1) Its recommendations as to the funds to be obtained pursuant to andSection;955.42 or andSection; 955.45;(2) Its recommendation as to any research projects; and(3) Its recommendations as to promotion activity and paid advertising.(d) Upon conclusion of each activity, but at least annually, the committeeshall summarize and report the results of such activity to the Secretary.(e) All marketing promotion activity engaged in by the committee, includingpaid advertising, shall be subject to the following terms and conditions:(1) No marketing promotion, including paid advertising, shall refer toany private brand, private trademark or private trade name;(2) No promotion or advertising shall disparage the quality, use, valueor sale of like or any other agricultural commodity or product, and nofalse or unwarranted claims shall be made in connection with the product;and(3) No promotion or advertising shall be undertaken without reason to beleivethat returns to producers will be improved by such activity.<ITAG tagnum="84">Reports and Recordkeeping</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.60 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reports and recordkeeping.</ITAG>Upon request of the committee, made with the approval of the Secretary,each handler shall furnish to the committee, in such manner and at suchtime as it may prescribe, such reports and other information as may benecessary for the committee to perform its duties under this part.(a) Such reports may include, but are not limited to, the following: (1)The quantities of Vidalia onions received by a handler; (2) the quantitiesdisposed of by the handler; (3) the date of each such disposition; and(4) the identification of the carrier transporting such Vidalia onions.(b) All such reports shall be held under appropriate protective classificationand custody by duly appointed employees of the committee, so that the informationcontained therein which may adversely affect the competitive position ofany handler in relation to other handlers will not be disclosed. Compilationsof general reports from data submitted by handlers is authorized, subjectto the prohibition of disclosure of an individual handler's identity oroperations.(c) Each handler shall maintain for at least two succeeding years suchrecords of the Vidalia onions received and disposed of by such handleras may be necessary to verify reports submitted to the committee pursuantto this section.<ITAG tagnum="84">Miscellaneous Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.71 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination or suspension.</ITAG>(a) The Secretary may at any time terminate the provisions of this partby giving at least one day's notice by means of a press release or in anyother manner which the Secretary may determine.(b) The Secretary shall terminate or suspend the operations of any or allof the provisions of this part whenever it is found that such provisionsdo not tend to effectuate the declared policy of the Act.(c) The Secretary shall terminate the provisions of this part at the endof any fiscal period whenever it is found that such termination is favoredby a majority of producers who, during a representative period, have beenengaged in the production of Vidalia onions: <T3>Provided, </T3>That such majority has, during such representative period,produced for market more than fifty percent of the volume of such Vadaliaonions produced for market, but such termination shall be effective onlyif announced on or before June 15 of the then current fiscal period.(d) Within six years of the effective date of this part, the Secretaryshall conduct a continuance referendum to ascertain whether continuanceof this part is favored by producers. Subsequent referenda to ascertaincontinuance shall be conducted every six years thereafter.(e) The provisions of this part shall, in any event, terminate wheneverthe provisions of the Act authorizing them cease to be in effect.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.72 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proceedings after termination.</ITAG>(a) Upon the termination of the provisions of this subpart, the then functioningmembers of the committee shall continue as joint trustees, for the purposeof liquidating the affairs of the committee, of all funds and propertythen in the possession, or under control, of the committee, including claimsfor any fund unpaid or property not delivered at the time of such termination.Action by said trusteeship shall require the concurrence of a majorityof the said trustees.(b) The said trustees shall continue in such capacity until dischargedby the Secretary; shall, from time to time, account for all receipts anddisbursements and deliver all property on hand, together with all booksand records of said committee and of the trustees, to such person as theSecretary may direct; and shall upon the request of the Secretary, executesuch assignments or other instruments necessary or appropriate to vestin such person full title and right to all of the funds, property, andclaims vested in said committee or the trustees pursuant to this subpart.(c) Any person to whom funds, property, or claims have been transferredor delivered by the committee or its members pursuant to this section shallbe subject to the same obligations imposed upon the members of the committeeand upon the said trustees.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.73 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effect of termination or amendment.</ITAG>Unless otherwise expressly provided by the Secretary, the termination ofthis subpart or of any regulation issued pursuant to this subpart, or theissuance of any amendments to either thereof, shall not:(a) Affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability which shallhave arisen or which may thereafter arise in connection with any provisionof this subpart or any regulation issued under this subpart;(b) Release or extinguish any violation of this subpart or of any regulationsissued under this subpart; or (c) Affect or impair any rights or remedies of the Secretary or of anyother person with respect to any such violations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.80 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Compliance.</ITAG>No handler shall handle Vidalia onions except in conformity with the provisionsof this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.81 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Right of the Secretary.</ITAG>The members of the committee (including successors and alternates) andany agent or employee appointed or employed by the committee shall be subjectto removal or suspension by the Secretary at any time. Each and every order,regulation, decision, determination, or other act of the committee shallbe subject to the continuing right of the Secretary to disapprove of thesame at any time. Upon such disapproval, the disapproved action of thecommittee shall be deemed null and void except as to acts done in reliancethereon or in compliance therewith prior to such disapproval by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.82 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of immunities.</ITAG>The benefits, privileges, and immunities conferred upon any person by virtueof this part shall cease upon the termination of this part, except withrespect to acts done under and during the existence of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.83 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Agents.</ITAG>The Secretary may, by designation in writing, name any person, includingany officer or employee of the Government, or name any agency in the UnitedStates Department of Agriculture, to act as the Secretary's agent or representativein connection with any of the provisions of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.84 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Derogation. </ITAG>Nothing contained in this part is, or shall be construed to be, in derogationor in modification of the rights of the Secretary or of the United Statesto exercise any powers granted by the Act or otherwise, or, in accordancewith such powers, to act in the premises whenever such action is deemedadvisable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.85 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Personal liability. </ITAG>No matter or alternate of the committee or any employee or agent thereof,shall be held personally responsible, either individually or jointly withothers, in any way whatsoever, to any handler or to any person for errorsin judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission,as such member, alternate, employee, or agent, except for acts of dishonesty,willful misconduct, or gross negligence.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.86 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Separability. </ITAG>If an provision of this part is declared invalid, or the applicabilitythereof to any person, circumstance, or thing is held invalid, the validityof the remainder of this part, or the applicability thereof to any otherperson, circumstance, or thing shall not be affected thereby.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 955.87 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendments. </ITAG>Amendments to this part may be proposed, from time to time, by the committeeor by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="84">Marketing Agreement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 955.90 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Counterparts. </ITAG>This agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts and when one counterpartsis signed by the Secretary, all such counterpart shall constitute, whentaken together, one and the same instrument as if all signatures were containedin one original.<ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 955.91 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Additional parties. </ITAG>After the effective date thereof, any handler may become a party to thisagreement if a counterpart is executed by such handler and delivered tothe Secretary. This agreement shall take effect as to such new contractingpart at the time such counterpart is delivered to the Secretary, and thebenefits, privileges, and immunities conferred by this agreement shallthen be effective as to such new contracting party.<ITAG tagnum="80">*andSection; 955.92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Order with marketing agreement. </ITAG>Each signatory hereby requests the Secretary to issue, pursuant to theAct, an order providing for regulating the handling of Vidalia onions inthe same manner as is provided for in this agreement.<ITAG tagnum="74">DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Agricultural Marketing Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Tentative Marketing Agreement Regulating the Handling of Vidalia OnionsGrown in Georgia</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The parties hereto, in order to effectuate the declared policy ofthe Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, as amended (Secs. 1-19,48 Stat. 31, as amended; 7 U.S.C. 601-674), and in accordance with theapplicable rules of practice and procedure effective thereunder (7 CFRPart 900) desire to enter into this agreement regulating the handling ofVidalia Onions grown in Georgia; and each party hereto agrees that suchhandling shall, from the effective date of this marketing agreement, bein conformity to, and in compliance with, the provisions of said marketingagreement as hereby enacted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The provisions of andSection;andSection; 955.1-955.92, inclusive, of theorder annexed to and made a part of the decision of the Secretary of Agriculturewith respect to a proposed marketing agreement and order regulating thehandling of Vidalia Onions grown in Georgia, plus the following additionalprovisions shall be, and the same hereby are, the terms and conditionshereof; and the specified provisions of said marketing annexed order arehereby incorporated into this marketing agreement as if set forth in fullherein:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">andSection; 955.90 Counterparts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This agreement may be executed in multiple counterparts and when onecounterpart is signed by the Secretary, all such counterparts shall constitute,when taken together, one and the same instrument as if all signatures werecontained in one original.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">andSection; 955.91 Additional parties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">After the effective date hereof, any handler may become a party tothis agreement if a counterpart is executed by such handler and deliveredto the Secretary. This agreement shall take effect as to such new contractingparty at the time such counterpart is delivered to the Secretary, and thebenefits, privileges, and immunities conferred by this agreement shallthen be effective so as to such new contracting party.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">andSection; 955.92 Order with marketing agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Each signatory handler requests the Secretary to issue, pursuant tothe Act, an order providing for regulating the handling of Vidalia Onionsin the same manner as is provided for in this agreement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The undersigned hereby authorizes the Director, Fruit and VegetableDivision, Agricultural Marketing Service, United States Department of Agriculture,to correct any typographical errors which may have been made in this marketingagreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the contracting parties, acting under the provisionsof the Act, for the purpose and subject to the limitations therein contained,and not otherwise, have hereto set their respective signatures and seals.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Firm Name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">By: \1\</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Signature)</ITAG><NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ If one of the contracting parties to this agreement isa corporation, my signature constitutes certification that I have the powergranted to me by the Board of Directors to bind this corporation to themarketing agreement.<ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Mailing Address)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Title)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Date of Execution</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Corporate Seal; if none, so state)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average five minutes per response, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed, and completing and reviewing the collection of information.Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to Department of Agriculture, Clearance Officer, OIRM, Room 404-W, Washington,D.C. 20503.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This information is required to determine voter eligibility and voteof Vidalia Onion handlers. Falsification of information on this governmentdocument may result in a fine of not more than $10,000 or imprisonmentfor not more than five years or both (18 U.S.C. 1001).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(For use by incorporated handlers)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">OMB Approval No: 0581-0160</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Expiration Date: 2/29/92</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="63">CERTIFICATE OF RESOLUTION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="63">(Corporation only)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">At a duly convened meeting of the Board of Directors of <T2>XXXXX</T2> held at <T2>XXXXX</T2> on the <T2>XXX </T2>day of <T2>XXX</T2> 1989, RESOLVED, That <T2>XXXXXXXXXX</T2> shall become a party to the marketing agreement regulatingthe handling of Vidalia Onions grown in Georgia, which was annexed to andmade part of the decision of the Secretary of Agriculture, and it is further,RESOLVED, That </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Title)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Title)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">be, and the same hereby are, authorized and directed severally orjointly to sign, execute, and deliver counterparts of the said agreementto the Secretary of Agriculture.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">I, </ITAG><T2>XXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXXX</T2>, <ITAG tagnum="20">Secretary of </ITAG><T2>XXXXXX</T2> do hereby certify this is a true and correct copy of aresolution adopted at the above named meeting as said resolution appearsin the minutes thereof.<ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"/><ITAG tagnum="20">(Address of Firm)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Corporate Seal; if none, so state)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-4427 Filed 2-22-89; 12:52 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-02-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>